Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
Number of Reviews
29

Author
Walter Frith
'Wild Wild West' saturates the screen with intense silliness and
deliberately attempts to be the ultimate summer movie.  Noisy, filled
with special effects, and full of in jokes from other aspects of pop
culture, the film begins rather poorly but picks up steam (including
using a train as a major prop) and has a villain as pleasing and as
charismatic as most seen in the movies in a very long time.  Barry
Sonnenfeld injects his jack-in-the-box style direction and his film
wobbles with a dizziness that works almost as well here as it did in his
1997 triumph, 'Men in Black'.  Much of 'Men in Black' will become dated
in the years to come, particularly the scene where the audience plays
witness to the secret observation room and on a giant projection screen
they observe many celebrities on Earth whom we discover in an irreverent
and joking way that they are actually aliens.  Borrowing from many
cheesy and low budget sci-fi movies from years gone by, Barry Sonnenfeld
used them in 'MIB' and uses many metaphors from classic stereotyped
westerns to do the same in 'Wild Wild West'.
Will Smith (James T. West) and Kevin Kline (Artemus Gordon) star as two
federal agents in post Civil war America, around 1870, who team up for
President Grant (also played by Kline and an in joke from 1993's 'Dave'
where Kline played a regular guy and a fictional U.S. president) to find
out who is kidnapping scientists involving a possible plot to bring down
the government.  Their investigation takes them to New Orleans where
they come in contact with Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh).  Loveless
is a former member of the confederacy who wants revenge on the Union
after losing his legs in the war and is forced to get around in a high
tech (for its time) wheelchair.  Loveless' symbol (like the Riddler's
question mark) is the spider.  It's on Loveless' flag, other personal
belongings, and he sends a few of the creatures with a gift for the
president enclosed in glass.  Dressed in dark clothing with a beard
trimmed to give you the true impression of evil, Branagh's villain
steals the show as many villains do on many occasions at the movies.  He
wants to overthrow the U.S. government and give the land back (for a
fee, of course) to Great Britain, France, Spain, Mexico and a couple of
others.
Joining West and Gordon in their adventure is Rtia Escobar (Salma
Hayek), who claims to be the daughter of one of the scientists kidnapped
and wants to tag along in the quest to find her father.  Naturally, both
men take a shine to her and vie for her affections.  Other members of
the cast include M. Emmet Walsh and Ted Levine.
It's entirely possible to dislike 'Wild Wild West' for all the right
reasons.  There is little chemistry between its two leads, the plot is
riddled with uneven qualities, contrivances and many scenes of
convoluted logic.  Aside from this (for me at least) is the feeling of a
guilty pleasure.  You know, one of those films you hate to admit you
like but you find that the movie works for you and you alone.  This is
the way the film struck me.
Will Smith articulates himself quite well this time.  Unlike his role in
'Men in Black' where his character was a little wet behind the ears in
his training by the elder Tommy Lee Jones as an agent chasing aliens,
Smith is completely cool and in charge as Jim West.  Kevin Kline plays
his role in the manner of an aristocrat.  Sort of like an American Dr.
Watson, full of dapper expressions in a surprisingly cool manner.  The
screenplay by Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. Seaman and S.S.
Wilson makes you wonder why it took four people to write it because in a
film where special effects take over in such an obvious way, this seems
to be a puzzle.  One thing I'm almost certain of is that for fans of the
western genre who are purists, this film isn't for them.  It's too high
tech for its era to please fans of the western but is still a good ride
full of mindless fun for the rest of us.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Stephen Sills
Rated PG-13 (violence, sexual themes, brief nudity, mild profanity)
I am continually amazed at movies like this.  That some producer would
waste an abundance of talent and money on a script as abysmal as this
one is mind-boggeling, but it seems to happen a lot nowadays.  "Wild
Wild West" is a beautifully filmed, well acted, and well directed
piece of garbage; and its insipid screenplay is completely at fault.
In short, this movie is a comedy without laughs.  So many jokes fall
flat that it borderlines surreal.  The high production values keep it
from being a total fiasco, but it's still pretty boring.   
Will Smith stars as Jim West, an old western, R&B variation of the
James Bond character.  West is teamed up with Artemus Gordon (Kevin
Kline), and they're pretty much polar oppisites: West prefers to solve
his problems with an array of bullets, Gordon traditionally favors a
more pacifistic approach.  Talk about deeply developed characters.  At
any rate, this leads to the inevitable conflicts between
methodologies, none of which are funny.
The year is 1869.  Several top scientists have been abducted, and the
suspected culprit is a disgruntled former Confederate General,
Bloodbath McGrath (Ted Levine).  President Grant sends West and Gordon
to investigate.  
There's evidence that McGrath is attending some sort of Confederate
reunion in Louisiana.  West and Gordon show up and learn that McGrath
is actually working for Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), another
disgruntled former Confederate.  As it turns out, Loveless plans to
use the combined knowledge of the scientests to create the ultimate
super weapon, which he will use to conquer the United States. 
I'd go further with the plot, but there isn't any point.  This film's
narrative is little more than a jumbled, unfunny mess.  I only laughed
at a couple of jokes, and then only lightly.  There isn't one truly
uprorously funny moment in this film, and that's pretty disasterous
when you consider that it's primarily a comedy.
As I said, the fault is totally that of the script.  When you consider
their respective roles, Will Smith and Kevil Kline do as good as they
could have possibly done.  The leads could've been played Samuel L.
Jackson and Robert De Niro and the film still would've been awful.  No
one, and I mean no one, can make a line like "Bye bye, Mr. Knife Guy!"
sound good.
Still, this film has a lot going for it visually.  The set design is
fantastic, maybe even Oscar worthy.  The cinematogrophy by Michael
Ballhaus (who was also behind camera in Martin Scorsese's brilliant
"Goodfellas") , is absolutely stunning.  He lends the film a much
needed exciting, comic bookish look.  I won't fault Barry Sonnenfeld
either.  He does a fine job of directing  the proceedings, but, like
the rest of the people involved with the film, there really isn't
anything that he can do to correct its one major flaw.  Despite being
beautifully made, "Wild Wild West" becomes quite boring after the
half-way point.  The appeal of the visuals ends long before the film
does. 
If "Wild Wild West" didn't look so good, it would be almost
insufferable.  As it is, it's somewhat tolerable, but not very
entertaining.  It hurts to give such a well made movie a score this
low, but there isn't anything much worse than an unfunny comedy.
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
If you want to read more of my reviews, visit my wet site at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Derby/3217.  I'm just getting the
site up so there are only a few reviews as of this writing, but I'm
trying to update it as frequently as possible.

Author
Jamey Hughton
Last summer, a feature-length version of The Avengers hit theaters to
the tune of a
unanimous critical panning. Based on the famous 60's television show,
the film was an enormous box-office flop and a huge disappointment for
Warner Bros. A year later, the studio is up to their old tricks again,
with the unnecessary revival of the Robert Conrad program The Wild, Wild
West. But it sounded promising: the same tag-team of star Will Smith and
director Barry Sonnenfeld, who both contributed to make Men in Black
such a financial success, is at the reins again. And co-star Kevin Kline
is attached to the project, as well as a substantial budget to spice up
the special effects. I mean, what could possibly go wrong?
The answer is just about everything. Wild Wild West is a cinematic
abomination - a film that was so entirely pointless to begin with that
it is never given a proper chance to get out of the gate. There are a
lot of fancy special effects, and a handful of distinguished actors who
try desperately to tunnel through the inane plot and make a lasting
impression. But the script is so deliriously uneven, the entire movie so
off course, that no human being or technical achievement has a chance to
salvage it.
At square one, we have a bizarre case of casting. Will Smith plays James
West, a renegade cowboy who was originally played by white actor Robert
Conrad in the TV series. My guess regarding the casting of
African-American Smith is a simple one: the actor + a cozy summertime
release = big bucks for all those involved. Smith is a very talented
performer who usually brings swift assurance to any comic relief
material, but this is not an ideal role for him. He's too much of a
joker. I heard that initial casting included George Clooney in the lead
role, and frankly, that sounds a lot more plausible. What makes matters
worse is that Smith goes through the role with such self-assurance in
his eyes; you can practically sense his contentment with the fact that
he knows Wild Wild West will be a huge hit at the summer box office.
The plot involves West and cross-dressing government agent Artemus
Gordon (Kevin Kline), who are assigned by the President to recover a
group of kidnapped scientists. The trail leads to the diabolical Dr.
Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), a man with no lower body who speaks
in a dry, witty southern accent. Loveless has taken the country's top
technical minds hostage so that they can assist in his deranged plan of
total government control, using lethal superweapons to destroy entire
towns. One such weapon is an 80-foot mechanical tarantula, bearing eight
spindly legs of thrashing metal and spewing enormous fireballs left and
right. The visual effects that bring this metallic bug to life are
spectacular, seamlessly blending computer-generated imagery with the
western surroundings. Unfortunately, all of these effects seem so
detached from the story, and can do little to support the film's plot
deficiencies, which are undoubtedly the main problem.
Wild Wild West is a running gag that never truly works. Most of the
jokes, usually care of Smith, die on arrival. If it's one thing that
could possibly be the saving grace, it's the performances, and even they
are mostly off-kilter and poorly delivered. Kline is admirable, but he
has little to do but invent silly devices on the spot. Salma Hayek is
wasted as the romantic interest, because she is viewed as little more
than that - window dressing to look pretty and create conflict between
West and Gordon. Branagh, an esteemed Shakespearean actor and director,
adds marginal enjoyment to the film. But even he is so utterly weird and
over-the-top. Rarely is a film so lost in itself as Wild Wild West is.
I suppose there's always one turkey of the summer season; a highly
anticipated, big-budget release that manages to completely disappoint.
Wild Wild West is such a movie, and will probably go down as one of the
biggest disappointments of 1999. But it is highly unlikely that this
will go down in defeat at the box office. Perhaps after this, audiences
will be less assured when they see Will Smith's name stamped on a summer
movie. After such hits as Independence Day and MiB, Wild Wild West is
not an impressive addition to the resume.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://Welcome.to/MovieViews
.......................

Author
Dustin Putman
An old television show (this time being the 1960s western/sci-fi series, "The 
Wild Wild West") turned into a big-screen feature film in the 1990s. Sound 
familiar? It should, considerieng that it's been done probably two dozen 
times in the last nine ten years, and not one of them have been good. Let's 
see, there was "The Flintstones," "Sgt. Bilko," "McHale's Navy," "Leave it to 
Beaver," "Maverick," "Lost in Space," "The Mod Squad,"...want me to go on?
Set in 1869, special government agent Jim West (Will Smith) and brilliant 
inventor and master of disguise Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline) are paired 
together by President Ulysses S. Grant (Kline, again) to stop the evil 
mastermind, Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), whose legs have been 
amputated and who is planning to take over the world with a giant mechanical, 
fire-throwing tarantula. In hot pursuit of Loveless, West and Gordon hop 
aboard a train, do wacky things, get off and are captured by Loveless, are 
chased by round metal razors through a cornfield, and finally, save the 
president, as well as a scantily-clad damsel-in-distress (Salma Hayek), and 
defeat Loveless and his entourage. The End.
If you are wondering what happened to the rest of the movie, or think that 
I'm exaggerating, I'm not. Basically, what you see in the trailer is what you 
get, and nothing more. 100 minutes long, but seeming more like an hour, "Wild 
Wild West" is the latest brainless special-effects extravaganza without any 
thought going into the story or characters. The film is an empty-headed 
excursion, not excruciating to sit through, but who would want to waste their 
money on something a 10-year-old could have written with more dimensions? A 
terrible sign to begin with, the screenplay was written by not one, not two, 
not three, but four different people who would probably prefer to remain 
nameless.
As Jim West, Will Smith is Will Smith, still the suave, wise-cracking hero 
who saves the day. Kevin Kline is clearly the more accomplished thespian and 
he proves it here, even in the midst of the intellectually dead story. Kline 
does wring a few laughs out of the screenplay, but something tells me that 
most of it was improvised and those jokes that work owe more than a little to 
his comic skills. Kenneth Branagh, as the wily Dr. Loveless, is doing nothing 
but grabbing a paycheck and running (at least, I hope, since those optical 
effects of his amputated legs are awfully realistic). And then we come to 
Salma Hayek, such a charming actress who is always far more funny and 
well-used when she makes talk show appearances, as opposed to appearing in 
movies. Hayek is fresh-faced, giddy, and is so severely wasted that, if I 
didn't know better, would guess she filmed all of her underwritten scenes in 
one day.
The only true saving grace of "Wild Wild West" is the marvelous production 
design by Bo Welch that is always fun to look at, and the offbeat music score 
by Elmer Bernstein. Too bad what we are watching within these technical 
aspects is devoid of any original ideas, and rarely any sort of comedic wit.
"Wild Wild West" is Will Smith's third film in the last four years to open on 
the 4th of July weekend. After meeting box-office success with the junky 
"Independence Day" and the empty "Men in Black" (which was also directed by 
"WWW" filmmaker, Barry Sonnenfeld), Smith's luck may have finally run out. 
Last year's "Enemy of the State" was a step in the right direction, but Smith 
next needs to prove that he can appear in more worthwhile film (as he did in 
1993's excellent drama, "Six Degrees of Seperation"), rather than wasting his 
time on overblown Hollywood products that exit the viewers' minds as soon as 
they leave the theater. That, in a nutshell, is exactly the case of the 
not-very-wild "Wild Wild West."
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Bill Chambers
WILD WILD WEST *˝ (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers ( wwwest@filmfreakcentral.net )
starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek
screenplay by Brent Maddock, S.S. Wilson, Peter S. Seaman, and Jeffrey
Price
directed by Barry Sonnenfeld
If you don't think Kevin Kline in drag is funny, wait til you see
Will Smith in drag-it's even less funny. By the time Jim West (Smith)
disguised himself as a belly dancer to bail his captured comrade,
Artemus Gordon (Kline), from the clutches of evil Dr. Loveless
(Branagh), I was unequivocally bored by Wild Wild West, the new summer
blockbuster from Men in Black director Barry Sonnenfeld.
Is the old west really a breeding ground for high comedy, anyway? (If
your answer is no, then you recall Rustler's Rhapsody or Back to the
Future Part III; if your answer is yes, you're thinking of Blazing
Saddles, but that movie was a parody of the western genre, not a
nineteenth century romp.)
1869. Jim West is a quick-draw lawman who teams up with brainiac
federal agent Gordon, under orders from President Grant (Kline again,
whose impression, for all we know, is dead-on), to apprehend legless
Loveless, the mad inventor who is plotting to divvy up the United
States and sell it back to Britain and Spain. How will Loveless
accomplish this? Well, by hulking around the desert in an enormous,
mechanical tarantula, of course.
Bosomy dance hall girl Rita Escobar (Hayek), whose scientist father
was kidnapped by Loveless, joins West and Gordon on their
gadget-filled train. (Gordon first discovers Rita in a cage, waiting
to be rescued.) Racial politics obviously prevented the filmmakers
from pairing dull Rita romantically with West, despite the movie's
"hip" attitude toward the black thing. (West automatically shoots
anyone who calls him a "nigger" before that person can finish speaking
the word. Super.) At any rate, I kept waiting for Rita to say
something humourous, but she's a walking dress-up toy. (Her single
comic moment is also the best shot of the film: she bashfully reveals
bare bumcheeks through the peek-a-boo flap of her pyjamas.)
Jim West is the role that finally stymied Will Smith, whose comic
timing has always been hit or miss, as episodes of "The Fresh Prince
of Bel-Air" demonstrate. Smith's a better reactor than actor, which is
why he was so thoroughly engaging in Men in Black-he didn't start out
a hero. In Wild Wild West he's required to exude Eastwood cool and
amuse at the same time (and from frame one), a difficult feat I'm not
sure any living performer could pull off. Smith is ill equipped, for
example, to handle the moment in which Jim West performs stand-up for
some rednecks at his own hanging. 
What attracted Sonnenfeld to this material? This isn't the first time
he has adapted a TV show for the big screen (The Addams Family,
anyone?), but it's the first big stinker of his career as a director.
Wild Wild West is poorly-paced bombast, full of DOA gags (Ted Levine
shows up as a general who uses a gramophone horn for a hearing aid;
Levine played Buffalo Bill in The Silence of the Lambs-he's too
intense to get an intentional laugh), lousy special effects (the
bluescreening is amateurish-foregrounds are never proportionate to the
backgrounds), and frequent illogic. (To wit, its ridiculous villain so
badly wants Jim West out of the way that he...drops him onto a steel
platform to do battle with some generic, ugly henchmen, instead of
shooting him at point blank rage with one of the many guns on board
the tarantula.)
Wild Wild West's bright spots, such as the cool opening credits
sequence, Bai Ling's all-too-brief appearance as a femme fatale, or
the brilliant "His Master's Voice" joke, are all part of the film's
first half, which is more clever and enjoyable, at least, than its
second. When, towards what seemed like the end of Wild Wild West,
Gordon proposes the idea of building an airplane and West rejects it,
there was a collective groan among audience members: it meant we were
going to have to sit through another loud action sequence before
Gordon builds the glider, the invention of which would inevitably lead
to the proverbial whiz-bang finale.

Author
Ross Anthony
The opening sequence brings back memories of the TV series it recreates on
the big screen. Not only is Jim West back, but now he's black! I absolutely
love that! Others may criticize feature film remakes of 50/60/70's TV shows
for changing character attributes; but hey, these are the 90's, filmmakers
have got to meet the changes of the viewing public. Taking a white character
and making him black ... it's very bold and I applaud the decision. Oddly,
it was Artemus Gordon's casting I would have liked re-thunk. Every time I
see Kevin Kline in a comedic role, I feel like he's trying to be Steve
Martin. Speaking of casting ... the menace, Arliss Loveless, is played
marvelously by Shakespearean actor Kenneth Branagh.
Jim and Artie are U.S. Marshals trying to protect President Grant from
less-than-pleased Southerners shortly following the civil war. Loveless (who
lost his legs in the war) has developed a steam powered weapon of mass
destruction with which to recapture the union. Salma Hayek plays Rita, a
plainly pointless character.
Artemus Gordon is an inventor bent on using his mind to botch the bad guy's
schemes, while Jim West, in the words of the President is a "Shoot first,
shoot later, shoot some more" kind of guy smooth with the ladies. These
characters haven't much more depth than that. But if you're looking for a
script thick with intrigue and dimension, then you're looking in the wrong
place. Aside for the slightly-adult sexual innuendoes, "Wild Wild West" is
an action comedy for the 10 year old -- give or take 3 or 4 years. They'll
no doubt love it. That's not to say you won't have fun. In fact, I was
having a real good time ... until the climax.
In fact, "WWW" sports some impressive stuff. The sinister Loveless bursts on
the screen from a shattered 10 foot model of Pres. Lincoln's head. How very
morbidly appropriate to his character! Further, "WWW" is also to be
applauded for it's creative design of Loveless' wheel-chair and master
weapon, and for Gordon's method of viewing a murdered scientist's last seen
image, among other less notable steam-powered creations. "A-" for fun,
special effects, and action right up to the climax where "WWW" wanes into a
"B+".
PS: For the record (forgive the pun), I don't like Will Smith dubbing over a
perfectly good Stevie Wonder track.
Starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh and Selma Hayek.
Directed by Barry Sonnenfeld.
Screenplay by S.S. Wilson & Brent Maddock and Jeffery Price & Peter S.
Seaman.
Produced by Jon Peters and Barry Sonnenfeld at Warner Bros.
Rated PG-13.
Grade..........................B+
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
James Brundage
Starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Selma Hayek, and Kenneth Brannaugh
Written by Brent Maddock, Jeffery Price, Peter S. Seaman, and S.S. Wilson
     I'm back.  I've been over at the other end of the country for about two
and a half weeks, going through the desert and California for no reason in
particular but unfortunately, in my whirlwind vacation of the country, I
have had no time to view a movie in theatres until today.   Today, I came
back.  Today, I watched Wild Wild West, Austin Powers 2, and my first
episode of "Sex and the City" in two and a half weeks.  I'm back.
     Unfortunately, both of these movies disappointed me. With Austin Powers
2, it was the buzz others had given it that made it a disappointment.  With
Wild Wild West, it feels as if it is a matter of faith.  I have faith, as
silly as it sounds, in Will Smith as a person able to pick hits.  I have
faith in Kenneth Brannaugh as a person able to pick intelligent roles.  I
have faith in Selma Hayek for being able to pick fun roles.  I have faith in
Kevin Kline as an actor normally (except for In & Out) to pick good movies.
Most of all, however, I have faith in Barry Sonnenfield, who has been on my
good side four movies in a row.  Ever since The Adams Family, he has had me
laughing and loving his movies.  I feel very betrayed by all five of these
people's latest endeavor, Wild Wild West.
     I'll admit that I haven't watched the TV series at all, but, you know
what, neither has the target audience.  Anyway, the TV series featured Jim
West as white and the movie is so dotted with racial humor that a major
resemblance wouldn't really be possible.  The fact remains that I did not
enjoy the movie, did not find it to be an intelligent film or even a very
fun film.  Barry Sonnenfield, for the past four movies, has turned out films
that are wildly funny, fast-paced, and highly intelligent.  Sure, we're all
tempted to say Men in  Black didn't have a brain because it was a summer
film and because it was based on a comic book but it did.  Yet, when Barry
and Will teamed up again for a go in the Wild Wild West, it turned out to be
a foray into the realm of complete disappointment.
     The plot, which four script doctors who probably haven't seen the TV
series either concocted, involves a evil Dr. Loveless (Brannaugh), a legless
psychopath out to conquer the world (of course) and the two secret agents
(Jim West and Atremis Gordon, played by Will Smith and Kevin Kline,
respectively) that stop him and save the girl (Selma Hayek).
    First off, the girl has absolutely zilch to do with the plot and is only
stuck in the film as a love interest.  I can both forgive this and figure
out why it happened (one of the five executive producers told the writers
that they needed a love interest for Will Smith).  Second off, the film
tries to be an action movie instead of being a comedy.  Barry Sonnfield may
be good at pace, but he's no good at action.  He can keep us interested by
the fact that we watch a character crack great jokes while solving a mystery
or figuring his way out of a problem, but he's no good at actually having an
action sequence take place.  Every time there is one in the film, it seems
stolen from somewhere else (i.e. the part where he goes under the train
reminding us all of Speed).  Third, the comedy seems highly contrived in
this film.  While it is not, as called by some preemptive bad-mouthers, Men
in Black Hats, Wild Wild West doesn't have the same original sense of humor
that Men in Black and Get Shorty did.  The sense of humor in this film is
much too contrived for that.  It drags its feet, sticks a good line in here
or there, and then is done for.
    This, of course, describes all of why the film in and of itself is bad.
Earlier, when I came out of the film, I figured it was just OK, but, in
retrospect, I can only justify it as bad.  The only great part of seeing
this film was seeing the full-length Eyes Wide Shut trailer in front of it.

Author
Robert Workman
The Happy Bastard's Quick Movie Review
A better name for this movie might've been "Wild Wild Waste".
Warner Bros., in an attempt to get their own Men In Black style of
movie, had managed to lasso in some big names (actor Will Smith and
director Barry Sonnenfeld, the duo behind MIB's success) in order to get
their own Fourth of July blockbuster, a contemporary big-screen update
to the classic western/sci-fi series The Wild Wild West starring Robert
Conrad.  But somehow, they ran into a problem along the way.  They were
so busy trying to fill specific roles that they forgot one in general
that would've made all the difference- a story writer.
Wild Wild West's story and script was compiled by six different people,
rather than just the one who put the brilliant touches on Men In Black,
Ed Solomon.  If Warner Bros. had gotten him, the movie would've possibly
been five times better than what it is.  Heck, ten times.  As is,
however, the story and screenplay is a mess, filled with dead laughs,
enough racist and sex jokes to make even Will cringe as he's performing
them, and a complete lack of chemistry that made the TV show work so
well.
Here's the story: US Army member James West (Will Smith) teams up with
creative genius Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline) to take on a ruthless
villain by the name of Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), whose lower
half was blown off during the Civil War, leaving him to roll around in a
steam-controlled wheelchair.  They catch onto a plot of his involving a
superweapon that can basically be considered an 80-foot tarantula
(although it looks bigger than that), hellbent on destroying anything in
its path.
As I said, the way the script unfolds is a complete mess.  But the
acting doesn't help either.  Kevin Kline is miserable as Gordon, failing
to display even a smidgeon of care as he did in the 1985 western
Silverado.  Smith seems to be having a better time as West, although
he's not nearly as charming as he was in MIB.  Branagh goes excessively
over the top as the villain, perhaps to the point where we can't even
stand to look at him or his strange beard.  And Salma Hayek is along for
the ride to search for her missing father, but mostly she exists just
for sexual attention.  Her acting is barely passable, but what a "breath
of fresh ass".
Director Barry Sonnenfeld isn't of great help either.  Even though he
shows some good creativity at some points, his overall urgency for
directing is lost.  It's as if he feels he's directing a TV movie, a big
no-no when you're helming what's supposed to be a big-screen hit.
Last but not least, there are huge gaps of logic that are just plain
unacceptable.  At one point, Smith defies gravity when first boarding
Kline's train.  He jumps on the back, gets launched straight UP in the
air, and somehow manages to land three cars ahead on the train- WHILE
IT'S STILL IN MOTION!  Also, he seems to be strangely comfortable
talking about racism in front of a lynch mob, particularly considering
the fact that his family was killed by the likes of such folks.  Last
but not least, why is he still making kissing faces when he KNOWS he's
not kissing a woman as he's looking through a peephole at the enemy?!
The ONLY saving grace for Wild Wild West come mostly in the form of
special effects.  The huge mechanical spider is a technical marvel, very
authentic looking and considerable to the creativity of the show.
There's also a good sequence involving metal magnet neckbraces and
spinning saw blades, but, again, a logic question comes into play
regarding their polarity.
I would say sit back and have a good time with Wild Wild West, but it
really isn't possible.  If the racist and sex jokes don't bother you,
the performances will.  If the performances don't bother you, the story
will.  If the story doesn't bother you, the racist and sex jokes will.
There's no end to the vicious circle.  Go rent Men In Black instead and
pretend Smith and Tommy Lee Jones are wearing cowboy hats.  You'll have
a better time.
If you DO go, keep an eye out for Robert Conrad in a role as president
Grant.  I bet HE wishes he were somewhere else...

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Based on the 1960s TV series that I had never seen or heard of before this
movie (Be happy, I won't bore you with any lame and unnecessary
comparisons), this film allows Will Smith to take a third stab at the
Independence Day weekend box-office, after scoring huge successes with MEN
IN BLACK (7/10), directed by the same man who controlled this one, and
INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10). Can you say...the third times NOT a charm?
PLOT:
James West and Artemus Gordon are chosen by the President to find the man
responsible for the kidnapping of the Nation's top scientists, and
threatening to take over the United States within a week.
CRITIQUE:
I did not laugh once during this entire picture. When you consider that this
film is a part-comedy, that's not a very good sign. I also did not tense up
or particularly enjoy any of its unenergetic action sequences which provided
me with little more than a few minutes time to think back to the lovely
Salma Hayek scenes. When you consider that the other "part" of this film is
geared as an action/adventure, I would say that this another negative sign.
And when you consider that the first hour of the film was boring and a
little slow, the story-line tired, reminiscent of Swiss cheese and
uninvolving, and the special effects interesting but worth very little
inside a plot filled with lame one-liners, weak characterizations and an
anti-climactic end, you pretty much have the gist of my impression of this
"big" summer blockbuster. It blows. Or as they say in French, "Eet blows".
Could it be that the script was crappy because it took four people to write
it? Maybe. Could it be that most of the special effects don't show up until
the last half hour, and even then, we don't see anything that its trailers
hadn't already given away? Perhaps. Or could it be that we have come to
expect so much more from Will Smith and Hollywood big-budget movies, that we
cannot help but evaluate them on a scale onto their own? Naaaaaaah! A bad
movie is a bad movie. On a positive note, I could honestly say that I did
very much enjoy the lovely performance by the adorable Salma Hayek, who
seemed underused (In my humble opinion), and lit up every bubbly scene that
she was hardly in. Branagh was also fun as the scenery-munching,
over-the-top bad guy, but that's pretty much where the entertainment-buck
stopped. Smith and Kline were static at best, the plot full of holes, and
the score insignificant and derivative of a dozen others. I would strongly
advise anyone not to see this movie. Then again, there is that one scene
with the lovely Salma Hayek tied up in a cage...huh...oh yeah, but the rest
of the movie sucked.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
Will Smith has starred in two of the ten all-time top grossing films
worldwide: 1997's summer blockbuster MEN IN BLACK (7/10), for which he also
recorded the Grammy-winning title song, and 1996's INDEPENDENCE DAY (6/10).
He once turned down a scholarship to MIT to pursue his singing career.
Kevin Kline is a graduate of the Juilliard School of Drama, and has been
married to the cute-as-a-button actress Phoebe Cates since 1989. They have
two kids together, Greta Simone and Owen. One of the buildings that gets
blown up in this film has "Kasdan" written on it. Lawrence Kasdan is a
director known to have worked with Kevin on five of his movies, including
THE BIG CHILL, SILVERADO, I LOVE YOU TO DEATH, GRAND CANYON and FRENCH KISS.
Salma Hayek gave up a successful career as a major television star in Latin
America and moved to the United States to start over, even though she spoke
no English. She made her feature film debut as an actress with a small role
in Allison Anders' MI VIDA LOCA (No, not the Rickie Martin video!) and
played her first starring role in Robert Rodriguez's DESPERADO opposite
Antonio Banderas. Since then, she has made an appearance in each one of
Rodriguez's films. She stands 5'2", was born in southeast Mexico, and the
daughter of a Lebanese father and a Mexican mother.
One of the actresses cast as Branagh's lovely but lethal beauties includes
Bail Ling, a stage and screen star in her native China who was last seen
starring opposite Dick Gere in RED CORNER (7/10). Another is Dutch-born
Frederique Van Der Wal, who is one of the world's most recognized
supermodels, having graced the cover of Cosmopolitan numerous times, as well
as Harper's Bazaar, Vogue and Mademoiselle.

Author
Bob Bloom
The Wild Wild West (1999) 1 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Will Smith, 
Kevin Kline, Salma Hayek and Kenneth Branagh. Directed by Barry 
Sonnenfeld.
 The West is neither very wild nor very funny in The Wild Wild West, the 
latest in a tiresome stream of adaptations of old television shows.
 Starring Will Smith as suave secret agent James West, the movie appears 
to need a jump start as it lurches from situation to situation.
 And, of course, the writers  six are credited, two for the story and 
four for the screenplay, a bad sign  have, in their infinite wisdom, 
sought to "improve" on the concept of the '60s TV series.
 Thus, Artemus Gordon (a hammy Kevin Kline) is not merely West's friend 
and assistant. No, here he's a U.S. marshal  a rival to West, at first 
 who, like in the TV series, is a master of disguise. But the writers 
do him one better, transforming him into a scientific genius who is 
always devising new and useful gadgets to extricate himself and West 
from various predicaments.
 The only saving grace to this campy confection is Smith, who breezes 
through the proceedings unconcerned about the ludicrous situations.
 Unlike Robert Conrad, who in the TV series was supposed to be suave and 
debonair, Smith's James West is a shoot-first, ask-questions-later type 
of hero.
 He is a smooth talker and a charmer, but he sounds more the con-artist 
than cultured government agent.
 What is embarrassing is watching Kenneth Branagh chew up the screen as 
the evil Dr. Loveless. He affects as thick a Southern accent that hasn't 
been heard on screen since Vivien Leigh complained about "War, war war!" 
in Gone With the Wind.
 The story, what little there is, revolves around Loveless' attempts to 
break up the United States and reclaim the honor of the South following 
its defeat in the Civil War.
 The chemistry that should exist between partners West and Gordon is nil.
 And the same goes for the actors portraying them. Throughout the movie 
it seems that Smith and Kline merely recite lines to one another, that 
they have not developed any rapport.
 Lovely Salma Hayek is wasted as the damsel in distress. She isn't in 
much danger, nor does she seem to be distressed that much.
 Director Barry Sonnenfeld, his actors and writers cannot seem to decide 
if they want to play the movie straight, tongue-in-cheek or campy, so 
they meander through all three with very mixed results.
 The Wild Wild West is a disappointment. Smith fans will enjoy this movie 
because their star gets most of the good one-liners. Other than that, 
there is no reason to go West, young people.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, 
IN. He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com. or at 
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Scott Renshaw
WILD WILD WEST
(Warner Bros.)
Starring:  Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, Ted
Levine.
Screenplay:  S. S. Wilson & Brent Maddock and Jeffrey Price & Peter S.
Seaman.
Producers:  Jon Peters and Barry Sonnenfeld.
Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld.
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes, violence, adult humor, profanity)
Running Time:  105 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     There are three ways you can go when you adapt a television series
for film.  You can poke fun, which worked well with the BRADY BUNCH films.
You can play it straight, which worked well with THE UNTOUCHABLES.  Or you
can pump it up with cinematic steroids, which has crashed and burned THE
AVENGERS, THE MOD SQUAD, LOST IN SPACE, MY FAVORITE MARTIAN, etc.  In
their zeal to dust off beloved small screen properties for the big
screen, producers often have ignored everything that made those properties
beloved in the first place.  The nostalgia card only plays so far, after
all -- if you want to bring in the kids, you've got to blow more stuff up.
     There was every reason to suspect that WILD WILD WEST would be the
latest T.V. charmer-turned-blockbuster monstrosity.  Producer Jon Peters
was renowned for embracing the "too much isn't nearly enough" ethos, and
word of disastrous test screenings had been leaking out of Hollywood for a
few months.  As it turns out, WILD WILD WEST is only part monstrosity and
part faithful re-creation, with neither approach working nearly as well as
it should.
     The principals are once again James West (Will Smith) and Artemus
Gordon (Kevin Kline), Federal agents circa 1869.  West, an Army
investigator, is a man of action; U. S. Marshal Gordon is an intellectual
inventor and master of disguise.  The two clashing personalities are
teamed up at the insistence of President Grant (also played by Kline) to
find out who is kidnapping scientists and threatening to overthrow the
government.  The trail leads to Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), an
embittered former Confederate scientist determined to take out on the
United States the loss of the lower half of his body in an experiment gone
awry.
     There are at least a few hints that director Barry Sonnenfeld is
interested in evoking tongue-in-cheek spirit of the series.  The main
title sequence includes the familiar tinted freeze-frames, the
protagonists still travel in their private train the Wanderer, and the
grand plans of the maniacal villain are appropriately maniacal.  The film
also hooks in to the series' anachronistic satire of James Bond-like
secret agent hijinks, which turns into a surprising problem.  In 1965, it
was fresh to watch Artemus play fussy Q to West's brawling Bond, fresh to
watch an adventure self-aware of adventure genre conventions.  In 1999,
hip referentiality just isn't hip any more, especially when it comes to
manly action heroes and their toys.  When Will Smith's character 
introduces himself as "West...James West," it should play as a winking
homage.  Instead, it just feels tired.
     When WILD WILD WEST doesn't work as a straight return to the gimmicks
and goofs of the series, there's always the bombastic special effects
route.  Gadgetry and megalomania were common elements of the series, but
a computer-rendered 80-foot-tall mechanized tarantula-tank doesn't have
quite the same low-tech appeal.  The overkill isn't even restricted to the
special effects, with Salma Hayek's va-va-voom appeal wasted for no other
reason than a little bare flesh.  And when the script is in need of an
easy joke, there's always Smith knowingly fending off Southern racism.
Branagh seems to understand the theatrical hamminess required for
Loveless, pitching the character as cartoonish as he can be.  His
cartoonish henchmen and henchwomen, on the other hand, are a waste of time
and fight choreography.
     WILD WILD WEST is so frantic that it spends too little time on its
strongest asset, the interplay between Smith and Kline.  Both actors have
fine comic timing, and both play up the rivalry between the gunslinger and
the deep thinker.  There are more enjoyable comic moments in WILD WILD
WEST than I was expecting, thanks to Sonnenfeld's sometimes surreal comic
touch (references to E. T. and the RCA Victor dog).  He just bounces back
and forth too often between approaches to the material.  It's uneven as
throwback entertainment, and it's uneven as contemporary action film -- a
wild wild mess of a movie that shows the danger of playing around with
previously successful material, no matter how you try to play it.

Author
Frankie Paiva
Imagine putting both Addams family movies together, adding a heap of sexual
innuendo, and placing the effects of Men in Black on top of it. Now imagine
taking the dry wit out of all these movies, adding an extreme amount of
violence, ethnical slurs, and push-up bras. 
Wild Wild West, a new creation of Barry Sonnenfeld, director of Get Shorty and
Men in Black tries to make it work...it doesn't. Exactly whose fault it is is
yet to be determined, so let me just give you an outline. 
James West (Smith, who still fits the superhero role nicely, but he's horribly
miscast) is teamed up with effects specialist Artemus Gordon (Kline, who puts
on that fancy-pants know-it-all thing that worked in In & Out, but not here) to
save president Grant from an 80-foot tarantula created by Arliss Loveless
(Kenneth Branagh, who, I'm ashamed to say, should stick with Helena Bonham
Carter and Shakespeare) he's using to take over the entire US government
turning the Northwest into Loveliss Land. 
Now this could be an original premise, but the film is so darned contrived that
you know Will Smith will win in the end. Whereas, Arlington Road (a better
action/paranoia thriller by about, oh, ** or *** stars) had a suprising
explosive ending that you couldn't see coming until the very end, this one's
obvious at about the 30-minute point.
I believe that the filmmakers realized this, so they decided to make the film
more fun by adding cool gadgets, heaps of jokes about breasts, tons of violence
(an extreme amount for a PG-13 movie) and racial and ethnic slurs that sound
like their coming from episodes of Jerry Springer and American History X. 
This film is not for children and parents should be very cautious about taking
them to it. I actually believe that a child would benefit much more from seeing
South Park: Bigger, Longer, and Uncut, Arlington Road, or maybe even American
Pie. Thus, I give Wild Wild West (the worst movie of the year so far along with
Virus) * 1/2 stars.

Author
Brian Takeshita
Back in 1965, a show titled "The Wild, Wild West" appeared on the
nation's television sets.  The show centered around Robert Conrad as
James West, and Ross Martin as Artemus Gordon, two Secret Service
agents answering directly to President Grant and sent about the
country to save civilization from conniving criminal elements.  Part
period western and part sci-fi, "The Wild, Wild West" has been
described by many as having been years ahead of its time.
The 1999 film version also seems to be ahead of its time, but in a
different way.  WILD WILD WEST is an immature movie that simply wasn't
thought out as well as it should have been.  In that respect, it was
released ahead of time.  Like that little twist?
The film presents us with Will Smith as West, and Kevin Kline as
Gordon, two mismatched government agents sent to hunt down former
Confederate General "Bloodbath" McGrath (Ted Levine), who is rumored
to be gathering men and weapons to start the Civil War all over again.
However, when McGrath narrowly slips through their fingers, and
President Grant receives a demand to sign over control of the United
States under the threat of the release of an ultimate weapon, the duo
is assigned to find an even bigger fish, Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth
Branagh).  Thought to have been killed fighting for the South during
the war, Loveless has been kidnapping the nation's top scientists, no
doubt for the purpose of building the means to back up his threat.
Without a doubt, Will Smith is the best thing going for this film.
He's likable, handsome, funny, and though a little scrawny, still a
believable action hero.  His comedic timing is better than most actors
out there today, and his ability to win over an audience by playing it
free and easy is quite notable.  This ability is evidenced in several
places in the film, but especially in a scene where he's trying to
talk a group of former southern slave owners out of hanging him.
Reactions of the mob cue the audience into a few extra laughs, but if
the camera never moved off of Smith's face, it would still be a riot.
Kevin Kline makes a valiant attempt at this movie, but just doesn't
have enough good material to keep his character interesting.  Gordon's
banter with West follows the buddy movie line, playing upon the
differences between West's no-nonsense, shoot first and ask questions
later approach, with Gordon's aversion to violence and reliance on
trickery, gadgetry, and costume.  Unfortunately, the conflicts between
the two characters are mostly contrived and therefore are not
conducive to producing much original dialog.
Branagh actually plays a pretty good over-the-top villain, a departure
from what we're used to seeing from the Shakespearean actor.
Unfortunately, his character is in the movie only about half of the
amount he should be, and therefore there isn't enough screentime for
Loveless to really walk around and develop.  You just kind of take it
for granted that he's evil.
As I said earlier, this film could have stood further development
before being put on film and released to theaters.  The overarching
story is fairly complete, but the logic in transitioning from one
scene to the next is sometimes lost and the explanations for certain
actions are fuzzy at best.  For example, it wasn't clear as to why
West and Gordon were looking for McGrath even after they were tasked
with looking for Loveless, and the reason Loveless betrays one of his
allies is never really given (and it's a major plot point).  Later in
the film, Loveless's henchmen (and henchwomen) get knocked off one by
one, but it's not always clear how, and I think at least a couple are
left unaccounted for - they just disappear.
Then there's Rita Escobar (Salma Hayek), whom West and Gordon rescue
from Loveless's lackeys, and then, of course, take along with them for
the rest of the movie.  The character serves no, I repeat, no purpose
in the film whatsoever. She had absolutely nothing to do with the
plot.  Loveless didn't have any kind of vendetta because of her, she
didn't unwittingly lead Loveless to them, didn't even make one of
those contrived dumb-girl mistakes that gets our boys into trouble.
Now, I might be the last person in the world who would complain about
Salma Hayek being in a movie I'm going to see, but the character is
just so superfluous, it's inexcusable.  Either give her something to
do or cut her out altogether.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld, who previously directed Will Smith in MEN
IN BLACK, apparently doesn't know how to shoot fight scenes (and there
are a few in WILD WILD WEST), because you simply can't see what's
going on.  A fist flying here, a kick there is all you can see, then
it's over.  In a more serious picture, this might have merit in adding
to the confusion of the situation, but in an action/comedy, the fights
are supposed to impress.  Hard to do if the action isn't visible.
Too often, the screenplay, apparently written in committee by Brent
Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. Seaman, and S.S. Wilson, goes for
jokes which are just too obvious.  There's a part, for example, when a
train conductor (M. Emmet Walsh) overhears a conversation between West
and Gordon in the wrong context, and it's supposed to be funny.  Like
I didn't get enough of that from so many years of watching "Three's
Company."
This lack of originality even extends into some of the action
sequences, such as an instance where West is attempting to stop a
runaway horse-drawn wagon by jumping onto the horses themselves.  They
abruptly stop just short of a cliff and send West over the front end,
leaving him dangling over the edge, holding onto the reigns.  Yeah, I
liked it the first time I saw it done with Arnold Schwarzeneggar in
TRUE LIES.
Okay, you know me, I gotta pick out the little things, too.  Loveless
refers to an armored battle wagon as a tank.  History lesson for
today:  The term "tank" did not originate until World War I, when
"tank" was used as a code word to conceal what was at the time a
secret weapon to break the stalemate of trench warfare.  Loveless
might have thought up the concept in the 1860's, but would almost
definitely not have used the word.  You can roll your eyes, now.
WILD WILD WEST has its moments, but they are too few and far between,
and each depends heavily on Will Smith.  It doesn't help, either, that
the end sets us up for a sequel.  Let's hope that if there is another
installment, it'll have a little more kick in the saddle.  Now excuse
me while I go ride off into the sunset.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Wild Wild West (1999) 
Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, Bai Ling, 
Frederique Van Der Wal, Musetta Vander, M. Emmet Walsh, Ted Levine, Sofia 
Eng, Ian Abercrombie, Kris Andersson, Christian Aubert, Ismael "East" 
Carlo, Carlos Cervantes, Debra Christofferson, Orestes Matacena, Jerry 
Potter, Steve Tom. Music by Elmer Bernstein. Written by S.S. Wilson & 
Brent Maddock and Jeffrey Price & Peter S. Seaman, from a story by Jim 
Thomas & John Thomas. Directed by Barry Sonnenfeld. 95 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 1.5 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
The centerpiece of "Wild Wild West" is a huge mechanical spider. In one 
scene, the metallic arachnid looms over a small Utah town, then lumbers 
forward in an ungainly, but impressive fashion, destroying everything in 
its path. The film is a lot like that giant spider. It looks great, but 
moves awkwardly and, whenever matters are in doubt, just blows stuff up. 
Based on the quirky sci-fi/western TV series from the '60s and directed 
by Barry Sonnenfeld ("Men in Black"), the credits for "Wild Wild West" 
indicate that it was written by (get this) S.S. Wilson & Brent Maddock 
and Jeffrey Price & Peter S. Seaman, from a story by Jim Thomas & John 
Thomas. Whew! Is there anything better than a film created by committee? 
The disjointed production plays as if Sonnenfeld threw several drafts of 
the script into the air, snagged pages at random as they fluttered down 
and started filming when he had a handful. Had the filmmakers spent a 
tenth as much time honing the script as they did on the nifty art 
direction, "Wild Wild West" would have been something more than drivel 
with a colorful candy coating. 
Set in the post-Civil War era, the film opens badly with a cumbersome 
sequence set at a West Virginian bordello, then moves to the White House, 
where President Ulysses S. Grant teams up a pair of quarreling special 
agents; brawler and all-around stud James T. West (Will Smith) and Felix 
Unger-ish inventor/master of disguise Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline). 
Together, they set off to battle the evil Dr. Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), 
a megalomaniac who, after losing the lower portion of his body in the war,
 kidnapped a group of scientists to create a super-weapon that would 
force Grant to surrender the newly re-United States. Oh, and lovely Rita 
Escobar (Salma Hayek) hooks up with the guys, hoping to rescue her father 
from the clutches of Loveless. 
The pluses of "Wild Wild West" are mostly visual. Gordon and West travel 
in a plush private train filled with Gordon's fanciful inventions. There 
are a number of striking sets, particularly Loveless' arachnid-themed 
mansion, which includes henchmen hidden within "living" paintings. The 
dapper Jim West and voluptuous Rita are easy on the eyes, and that giant 
mechanical spider is a knockout. 
The minuses are the lurching, unfocused storyline and hack script, which 
forces a lot of talented actors to recite some truly lame sentences. For 
every good one-liner, there are five duds and even the charismatic Will 
Smith can't salvage lines like "That's it. No more Mister Knife Guy!" 
"Wild Wild West" is designed as lightweight summer fun and its 
combination of attractive actors and retro-cool gadgets may be enough for 
some. But with Barry Sonnenfeld's track record and a cast this talented, 
we have a right to expect more than flashy effects, a few good moments 
and a lot of half-ass shtick. 

Author
Steve Rhodes
Will Smith, what were you thinking when you signed on to do Barry
Sonnenfeld's WILD WILD WEST?  After reading the script by the writing
committee of S. S. Wilson, Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price and Peter S.
Seaman, why did you go ahead?  Surely someone as bankable as you could
have gotten a dozen better projects.
Set in 1869 and based on the old television series, WILD WILD WEST stars
Smith as Agent James West.  West, described by President Grant as
someone with the tendency to "shoot first, shoot later, then after
everyone is dead, ask a few questions," likes to rely on his fists and
his six-shooter to fight his battles.
In contrast, inventor Artemus Gordon, played by Kevin Kline, who does
double duty as President Grant, looks to his scientific skills to come
up with the right contraption for every confrontation.
With possibly the worst movie beard ever, Kenneth Branagh shamelessly
overacts as the story's villain, Dr. Arliss Loveless, who is trying to
capture Grant and take over the country.  What is the greatest
Shakespearean actor in the world today doing in such an abomination?  Is
the money really worth it?  The rest of the cast (Smith, Kline and Salma
Hayek) sleepwalk through their parts.  Smith, who appears distracted and
distant, periodically grins as if he were calculating his enormous
salary as a way to pass the time.
West is first seen naked in a hot (actually a cold) tub with a naked
woman.  The story has an obsession for boob jokes -- punching boobs,
flamethrower boobs and fake boobs.
The humorless and mean-spirited script displays a series of elaborate
mechanical contraptions as a way to run out the movie's clock.  Typical
of the crude humor is a grizzled old civil war veteran who has lost his
ear.  Where his ear should be is a permanently mounted ear horn, which
he turns over periodically to discharge puss.
Smith is reduced to bad Stepin Fetchit-style humor.  In the story's low
point, Loveless, a legless paraplegic, engages in crude racist insults
to West, while West returns a series of bad handicap barbs to Loveless.
The gadget-laden movie features an ugly, steam-powered tarantula that is
80-feet tall.  It is clear that lots of money was wasted in the film's
lavish production.  Rather than make one extremely expensive, horrible
movie, the studio could have made many more modestly budgeted and
hopefully better movies.
The problem with movies like WILD WILD WEST, even if it has grossed over
$100,000,000 domestically (not including those lucrative foreign box
office receipts and video sales), is its effect on the fans of its
stars.  When they agree to be in such a miserable movie and then show no
life while acting their parts, it is as if they are thumbing their noses
at the fans who flock to their movies.
WILD WILD WEST runs a long 1:47.  It is rated PG-13 for action violence,
sex references and innuendo and would be acceptable for kids around 10
and up.
My son Jeffrey, age 10, gave the film just **.  He liked the inventions
plus all of the "shooting, punching and kicking."
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Greg King
WILD WILD WEST (PG).  
(Warner Bros/Village Roadshow)
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Stars: Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, Ted Levine, 
M Emmett Walsh, Frederique van der Wal, Musetia Vander, Sofia Eng,
Bai Ling, Rodney A Grant
Running time: 106 minutes.
Hollywood again proves that it has lost the plot with yet
another misguided attempt at bringing a forgotten '60's tv series to
the screen.  Wild Wild West followed the exploits of a pair of secret
government agents who travelled across the wild frontier by train
thwarting threats against the country.  This big screen version
ultimately seems little more than a camp, second rate Bond-like
adventure set against the background of the old west.
From the outset, with its fresh, hip hop take on the familiar
theme music, it's clear that this new look Wild Wild West is far
removed from the original tv series, and clearly determined to follow
its own slightly modern path.  A horribly miscast Will Smith (Enemy Of
the People, etc) steps into the Robert Conrad role of James West,
President Grant's top secret agent.  Although the film is set in the
years immediately following the Civil War, the thought of a black man
venturing unobtrusively through the frontier and battling villainous
plots is a little too incredible to swallow.
The film is set in 1869, several years after the destructive
and divisive Civil War has left its scars on the fledgling nation's
psyche.  Long presumed dead, the embittered and crippled Dr Arliss
Loveless (Kenneth Branagh) re-emerges from hiding, driven by a
megalomaniacal lust for power.  He has conceived a preposterous plot
to dismantle the Union and return the various states to their previous
owners.  He has kidnapped several notable scientists, and forced them
to work on his ultimate weapon of mass destruction - actually a giant
mechanical spider which stomps across the frontier blasting towns into
oblivion - in the hope of blackmailing President Grant into agreeing
to his demands.
Enter West (Smith) and Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline), two of
Grant's top agents, who are forced into a reluctant partnership to
thwart Loveless's diabolical scheme.  West is an impulsive man of
action who shoots first, while Gordon is a more thoughtful but
somewhat eccentric agent, with a penchant for disguises and clever
inventions that are ahead of their time.  This odd couple pairing
follows a predictable formula, although their relationship brings an
almost contemporary sensibility to this unorthodox western.
The pair spark a number of laughs along the way, with plenty
of snappy one-liners and some risque humour.  The best gags though are
the visual ones, in particular a series of sly in-jokes depicting some
contemporary cultural icons.
The film starts off promisingly enough, but degenerates into
camp farce with the arrival of the legless Loveless and his amazon
army.  Branagh's performance is all corn-ball humour and dreary accent
and bad jokes, and he hardly establishes a menacing presence.
Smith brings an arrogant attitude to the role, but his
performance lends a contemporary flavour to the character.  Kline
actually plays a dual role here, appearing both as Gordon and as
President Grant, and he brings a nice comic edge to his performance.
Although Smith and Kline develop a good rapport and work well
together, they deserve better material.  The vivacious Salma Hayek is
wasted in thankless, exploitive role that doesn't really allow her to
do much.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld (Men In Black, etc) is a dab hand
with the spectacular effects and gimmickry on display, but somehow the
whole thing lacks credibility and a genuine sense of excitement.  With
this often silly mix of western action and high-tech gadgetry,
Sonnenfeld and his team of gun writers, which includes S S Wilson and
Brent Maddock (Short Circuit, etc) and Jeffrey Price and Peter S
Seaman (Who Framed Roger Rabbit?, etc), seem unsure of their target
audience.  Like the B-grade, megalomaniacal Bond villain of the piece,
this lame attempt to revive the '60's television series lacks any sort
of legs, and fails to last the distance.  Tame tame west is more like
it!

Author
Michael Dequina
_Wild_Wild_West_ (PG-13) ** (out of ****)
Every summer has one: a film that, from early indications, appears to be
a surefire blockbuster, but finds itself under a billowing cloud of bad
buzz as its release date approaches.  Last year, it was TriStar's
_Godzilla_; this year's whipping boy has been Warner Bros.'s
_Wild_Wild_West_, which arrives on screens in time for the July 4th
weekend amid a flurry of talk of budget overruns and poor insider
screenings.  The good news: the adaptation of the 1960s television series
is far from the excrutiating embarrassment the studio had last year with
the similarly-conceived _The_Avengers_.  The bad news: that fact doesn't
necessarily make this shockingly flat comedy-adventure much better a
movie.
The parts certainly appeared to be in place.  Independence day box
office king Will Smith and another consistently entertaining star, Kevin
Kline, team up as 19th century U.S. government agents James West and
Artemus Gordon, respectively, for Smith's _Men_in_Black_ director, Barry
Sonnenfeld.  Providing the villainy as Arliss Loveless, the
wheelchair-bound, arachnid-obsessed mad genius determined to seize
control of the country, is no less than multiple Oscar nominee Kenneth
Branagh.  And as a final dash of spice, Salma Hayek is on hand to lend
her sexy screen presence as lingerie-clad saloon entertainer Rita
Escobar.
Oddly enough, like a botched chemical equation, these seemingly perfect
ingredients combine into a fizzle.  Together, live wires Smith and Kline
should combust in theory.  But while they do have a couple of moments of
spirited repartee, their overall lukewarm rapport won't make anyone
forget Smith's sterling bond with Tommy Lee Jones in _MiB_.  In fact,
despite his ever-magnetic screen presence, Smith is an ill fit for the
part of West.  He is a versatile performer able to adequately tackle both
drama and comedy, but his limits are tested as a largely deadpan tough
guy.  Not helping matters for him or Kline are the lame one-liners
foisted upon them by the four credited writers (none of whom are worth
mentioning here by name).  For example, following the disposal of a
blade-wielding villain, West not-so-wisely cracks, "No more Mr. Knife
Guy."
The other two above-the-title stars don't fare much better.  The casting
of Shakespearean Branagh as a legless baddie should be a hoot, but he,
like Sean Connery in _The_Avengers_, strains too hard to be outrageously
over-the-top that he drains the character of any sense of fun.  Hayek's
bubbly playfulness could have compensated--that is, if she had anything
remotely resembling an actual character to play.  In her scant screen
time, Hayek is called on to lavish compliments on either Gordon or
(especially) West, model revealing outfits, and flash her buttocks.  What
a progressive role for a woman.
Sonnenfeld was obviously too busy paying attention to _Wild_Wild_West_'s
technical aspects to notice what was going on with his actors.  The
digital effects used to depict Loveless's signature machine of
destruction, the Tarantula, are spectacular and blend seamlessly with the
real-life footage.  Bo Welch's production design imaginatively blends
period Western touches with more modern innovation, particularly in West
and Gordon's  specially-equipped train car, the Wanderer.  As lackluster
as many of the lines get, other details in the production keep the film
watchable.
In the end, that's all _Wild_Wild_West_ is--watchable; not necessarily
awful, yet certainly not good, either.  But mere watchability isn't
exactly what moviegoers are looking for when buying a ticket for
_Wild_Wild_West_; they want some plain old summer movie fun and
excitement.  Unfortunately, Smith isn't the man to give it to them--at
least not this summer.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com


Author
Chad Polenz
Wild Wild West
Chad'z rating: ** (out of 4 = fair/below average)
1999, PG-13, 107 minutes [1 hour, 47 minutes]
[adventure/comedy/western]
Starring: Will Smith (Jim West), Kevin Kline (Artemus Gordon), Kenneth 
Branagh (Dr. Arliss Loveless), Selma Hayek (Rita Escobar); written by Jim 
Thomas, John Thomas, S.S. Wilson, Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. 
Seaman; produced by Jon Peters, Barry Sonnenfeld; based on the television 
series `The Wild Wild West' created by Michael Garrison.
Seen July 7, 1999 at 8:20 p.m. at the Crossgates Cinema 18 (Guilderland, NY), 
theater #3, with Shawn O'Shea, for free using my Hoyts season pass [theater 
rating: ****: excellent sound, picture and seats].
        Have you ever stayed up really late on a week night and then when you 
went to work or school the next day the whole experience was like a haze? Or, 
have you ever taken an antihistamine and tried to concentrate on anything 
despite the drowsiness? That's exactly the feeling `Wild Wild West' gives off 
- a film that feels like the result of a collaboration of a bunch of people 
too doped up on allergy and cold medicine to care about what they're doing.
        Every summer we are bombarded with elaborate, big-budget, super-star 
flicks whose sole purpose is to fill up the cineplexes, sell a lot of 
t-shirts, fast food and other merchandise (here in New York there is even a 
scratch-off lottery game based on this movie!). Both critics and audiences 
have grown accustomed to seeing these works that tend to blend together after 
a while, so we try to keep our expectations low.
        And with with `Wild Wild West' it's no different consider what it has 
going for it: international superstar Will Smith in the lead role; director 
Barry Sonnenfeld who has always made good movies; the fact it's based on a 
popular old television series (that'll bring in the Baby Boomers); a 
marketing strategy promising action, comedy and special effects (that'll 
bring in the GenXers); and an overall feeling that anyone could like the 
movie, so what goes wrong?
        Actually, the real question should be, what goes right?
        The first example of the film erroneous ways can be found in the 
opening credits alone which show Andy Warhol-style pictures of the stars' 
faces and names over a generic Hollywood western theme. Not having seen the 
show the film was based on, I can't say if it's the same as the show's 
original opening, but what I do know is that in 1999 this sort of lead-in 
doesn't give one the feeling he or she is about to watch something exciting. 
Even the music is boring and vaguely familiar so in the back of your mind 
you're thinking `rip-off!'
        The story starts out with a scene of a scientist being killed by some 
kind of mysterious device and a typical old, ugly, redneck stands over him 
and says ignoranamous and stupid (you know, something they only say in bad 
westerns). We then cut to our hero, Jim West (Smith), who is messing around 
with a woman in a water tower, which of course proceeds to fall over and a 
scene of West single-handedly fighting off a bunch of generic bad-guy cowboys 
while still in the buff ensues. But this scene doesn't deliver much because 
it is so completely and fully predictable. Smith isn't outrageous here 
because he's doing his same old schtick, which at least works in other movies 
because he had smart dialogue and a good script to work with, here it just 
seems lame.
        It turns out West is some kind of important federal government guy, 
like a military intelligence officer or something (shows you how much 
importance is paid to details by the screenplay). Now, this is pretty amazing 
considering the fact the story takes places in the 1860s, just after the U.S. 
Civil War - would a black man really be in such an important position? But 
this factor is at least plausible compared to many of the other details and 
plot points to come.
        West is on the trail of General McGrath (Ted Levine), the evil 
ogre-like guy from the first scene, who has been kidnapping scientists all 
over the country. Also on McGrath's trail is Artemus Gordon (Kline), a U.S. 
Marshall who's somewhat of a mad scientist and inventor and likes to go 
undercover in drag (always a guarantee for comedy). The two come together 
early on in a saloon riot scene which tips us off to who the real villain is, 
and of course allows for some wild action and explosions, the introduction of 
the femme fatale (Hayek as Rita Escobar - a saloon dancer) and the main 
details of the plot.
        After West and Gordon meet with President Ulysses S. Grant, they find 
themselves in a forced partnership on a cross-country road trip to hunt down 
both McGrath and the really vile Dr. Arliss Loveless (Branagh - whose 
performance is so excellent it completely outshines everyone and everything 
else in the film). Loveless is behind the kidnapping of the scientists for a 
plot that's obviously sinister (aren't they all sinister? Villains don't 
usually have schemes meant to just annoy someone - they're always all or 
nothing). In fact, it's so sinister it involves taking over the entire United 
States, or at least getting Grant to surrender the country.
        You can pretty much tell where the story is going from here and I 
won't waste time by elaborating further since anyone who's seen the trailer 
or just the movie poster for knows what Loveless's big concoction is and that 
it's something our heroes will have to beat without any wizardry of their own.
        The problem with the film is how it carries out this plot through a 
screenplay so trite, so lame and so full of plot holes and missing details 
that it's difficult to understand how this could have been given the green 
light in the first place.
        Most of the scenes, and the film as a whole for that matter, play 
like something that would work in an animated feature, but not in this 
supposed `serious' live-action adventure story (serious in that it's not a 
straight comedy). Would West really be able to simply talk his way out of 
being hanged by a redneck mob? Are the inventions Gordon comes up with for 
comic relief or practical use? Would a nasty villain like Loveless pass up 
the opportunity for total victory just for a quick sexual stimulation? Why 
have a sexy female supporting character if she doesn't do anything else 
besides sit around and watch the men?
        Oh, we could answer these questions easily, which are all ideas the 
filmmakers don't want us to think about. Yet, even if we're to take 
everything that happens on the big screen just for its entertainment value, 
it's still nearly impossible to find much to enjoy. The action isn't 
exciting, the heroes aren't heroic, the villain is beyond cliche, the jokes 
are rarely funny and the ending is predictable.
        I'd like to believe that at some point `Wild Wild West' was and 
could've been exactly what it sets out to be. There's really nothing wrong 
with zany action, wild comedy and special effects within the context of a 
good story and a well-directed ensemble. Unfortunately, this film seems to a 
collection of mistakes meant to correct even worse mistakes.
---------------------------------
Please visit Chad'z 
Movie Page
 - over 220 new and old movies reviewed in-depth, not just blind ratings 
and blather capsules.
Member of The O.F.C.S. (Online Film 
Critics Society)

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Cast: Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma Hayek, M. Emmet
Walsh, Ted Levine, Frederique Van Der Wal
Screenplay: Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price, Peter S. Seaman, S.S. Wilson
Producers: Jon Peters, Barry Sonnenfeld
Runtime: 115 min.
US Distribution: Warner Bros.
Rated R: Action violence, sex references
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        Just as you might expect from any movie starring Will Smith and
released the 4th of July weekend, Barry Sonnenfeld's Wild Wild West will
remind you of how much money can be spent on a motion picture.  You can
feel the dollars that went into this movie.  It's one of those
ludicrously expensive films that makes you wonder just how much money
there really is in the world.  It's a massively unrestrained production,
bursting with computer-generated special effects in nearly every scene. 
The film is so obviously overpriced that I couldn't help but consider
the various costs of things, such as how much money it takes to
digitally remove Kenneth Branagh's legs from every scene he's in.  
And boy, I wish I could say I hated every minute of it.  The fact is, I
enjoyed this silly movie for almost every second I sat watching it, even
though the special effects are given more consideration than the
characters, even though it's astonishing to think of the financial
aspects behind the picture.  What makes Wild Wild West a likable
disaster of a summer blockbuster is Sonnenfeld's out-of-whack sense of
humor, and three goofy performances by three fine actors.  It's the
textbook definition of a guilty pleasure -- I hated myself for not
despising it.
The film is the latest chapter in a long line of Hollywood television
series remakes.  Will Smith stars as the gun-toting Jim West, assigned
by president Ulysses Grant to track down and destroy the renegade
General McGrath (Ted Levine).  West is teamed up with Artemus Gordon
(Kevin Kline), a gadget-happy U.S. Marshal who produces machines that
could not possibly have existed at any time in the 1800s.  Further
developments uncover the fact that the true villain is a legless
Suthun'er named Arliss Loveless (Branagh, decked out in a wacky beard
and long, jet-black hair).  Salma Hayek is also on board as the
necessary love interest, the twist being that both heroes are interested
in her love.
Wild Wild West suffers from the typical symptoms of Summer Blockbuster
Syndrome (SBS), including high-energy incoherence, intrusively
overproduced sets and special effects, a distinct lack in true story
development, and cartoonish characterizations.  Barry Sonnenfeld is one
of those directors I can't handle in large doses; he seems to operate in
a self-destructive manner, creating scenes and sequences so over-the-top
that it's easier to laugh at their sheer absurdity than it is to laugh
at the jokes he sprinkles about them.  Consider, for instance, the scene
in which West and Gordon first witness Loveless' giant mechanical
spider.  It's an amazing special effect, and really quite extraordinary
to witness on screen, but it's such an insane image that I could only
wonder what kind of mind would have thought to create it.
If that makes Wild Wild West a bad movie, at least it's an entertaining
bad movie.  Some critics have stated that Smith and Kline have no
chemistry, but I disagree.  Both actors have proven themselves as
effective comedians in previous films, and they don't botch the job
here.  Smith has kind of a dumfounded gaze on his face the whole way
through the film; this may be from a lack of compelling dialogue, or
perhaps he felt despair under the realization that a giant mechanical
spider is ultimately going to be more memorable than his performance. 
Nonetheless, he has an undeniably likable presence.  The same goes for
Kline, who works with Smith smoothly.  Kline is a more experienced comic
actor, and it shows -- he manages to get into his role a little better,
and actually makes Gordon a semi-credible character.
Branagh is absolutely perfect as the villain, and I think he hits the
note that Sonnenfeld was shooting for.  His performance is so absurd, so
far over the edge of sanity, that it's utterly impossible to take him
even the slightest bit seriously (not to mention the fact that your
attention will be focused on how they were able to digitally remove his
legs).  The scenes with Branagh ultimately work the best, and remind us
of the intended tone for the rest of the film.  There is a brain in Wild
Wild West -- it's not a stupid movie -- but it's not a very
well-adjusted picture, and often feels like it belongs in the cinematic
equivalent of a psychiatric ward.
And then there's the money issue, and the idea that not making this
film might have covered food bills for the entire populations of six or
seven third-world countries.  Even though the production design is very
fancy, and even though the special effects have a kind of imposing
realism about them, I couldn't help but feel bad for indulging in a film
as blatantly overpriced as this one.  I mean, we're talking a lot of
bucks here.  Barry Sonnenfeld has created what might go down as the
perfect illustration of a summer blockbuster -- a giant, insane,
two-million-bucks-a-minute extravaganza of tongue-in-cheek nonsense,
starring Will Smith, coming to a theater near you this 4th of July.
Psychosis Rating:  6/10

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Warner Bros./ Peters Entertainment
 Director:  Barry Sonnenfeld
 Writer:  S.S. Wilson & Brent Maddock and Jeffrey Price &
Peter S. Seaman, from a story by Jim Thomas & John
Thomas
 Cast: Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Kenneth Branagh, Salma
Hayek, Bai Ling, Frederique Van Der Wal, Musetta Vander
   James Bond and Leonardo da Vinci meet Godzilla and Dr.
Strangelove--sort of--in this moderately amusing summer
action comedy which, for all its faltering one-liners displays
quite a bit of pizazz.  The James in the film, however, is a
character known as James T. West (Will Smith), the Godzilla-
like creature is actually the biggest darn arachnid you've ever
seen.  The Bond is in fact the link between West and
Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline), two opposites who learn that
in order to survive the evil scheme of the legless villain, Dr.
Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), they must learn to meld
their distinct talents into an awesome fighting team.
   Directed by Barry Sonnenfeld--whose "Men in Black"
hitched the talented Will Smith to Tommy Lee Jones in a hip
spin on the sci-fi invasion genre--"Wild Wild West" arrays
some of the originality and sharp pacing of the 1997 saga. 
But whereas Ed Solomon's perky screenplay for "Men in
Black" exquisitely adapted Lowell Cunningham's Malibu comic
for the screen, the dialogue here takes a back seat to the
dynamic computer-generated visuals, leaving Smith, Kline,
and Salma Hayak to wow the summer crowds with perpetual
motion in lieu of a great deal of clever repartee.
   After an unpromising start featuring the slimy and scheming
General Bloodbath McGrath (Ted Levine), a hideous creature
with a prosthetic ear who makes the rounds of a post-bellum
bar-cum-whorehouse in West Virginia--Sonnenfeld takes us to
the White House in Washington, where special agents James
T. West and Artemus Gordon are given assignments by
President Ulysses S. Grant.  Gordon is a cerebral fellow who
uses his analytical mind to fashion useful inventions.  He has
invented a bulletproof vest, an array of Bond-like gadgets on
his opulent train known as The Wanderer, and is soon to
experiment with the design of a heavier-than-air flying
machine.  His partner, West, is strictly the physical type: the
sort who would shoot first, shoot second, and then shoot
again before starting to ask questions.  Though at first they
can barely tolerate each other, they learn to combine their
abilities to thwart the wicked Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth
Branagh), a Strangelovian villain determined to avenge
himself against the victorious North against whom he lost
both of his legs in battle.  (Sonnefeld's use of a bevy of
Brunhildes serves to furnish Loveless with a Nazi tenor.) Rita
Escobar (Salma Hayek) provides the sexual tension such as
there is, teaming up with West and Gordon to find her father,
who has been kidnapped by Loveless in a plot to force
President Grant to sign a surrender which would reverse the
outcome of the Civil War.  
   Most of the fun of this pure summer entertainment should
have been in the one-liners thrown out by Smith and Kline as
they snipe at each other while tracking down the smart,
articulate scoundrel.  But a good deal of Will Smith's shtick
runs the gamut from the obvious to the embarrassing, the
latter most prominent in his sick-joke treatment of the
wheelchair-bound Loveless.  "We have a nice half-jail cell
picked out for you," he sneers when he appears to have
caught up with Loveless; and "You know women--they'll cut
the legs right out from under you."  When he is about to be
lynched by a group of southern whites who object to the
man's calling them rednecks, West tries to talk his way out of
the rope by explaining that "redneck" is not a bad word at all:
"Red means passion," he explains, "And neck...well I can't
think of anything for neck," he grouses.  To appease the
band of vindictive Confederates, he continues, "About the
slavery issue--I don't see what's the big deal...I don't blame
you for not wanting to get your own fat asses out of bed and
pick your own cotton."  The bon mots are pretty much on that
level.
   The film's appeal comes mostly from the crafty gadgets
invented by Gordon to foil the enemy, but principally from the
luxurious train the man rides and from the 80-foot mechanical
spider constructed by Dr. Loveless to compensate him
metaphorically for his lost limbs.  West and Gordon must
continually devise schemes to avoid the clutches of the steel
tarantula, with Gordon's keen mind outpacing West's more
physical nature.  When Gordon observes a wasp descending
with extreme prejudice on a black spider in the Utah desert
(actually filmed on a New Mexico ranch), he conceives a
blueprint to foil his nemesis.
   Salma Hayek has virtually nothing to do, performing in one
instance as the literal butt of one visual joke aboard the train,
while Kevin Kline and Will Smith do not come close to
matching the chemistry of Smith's team-up with Tommy Lee
Jones two years back.  Kenneth Branagh, disguised almost
beyond recognition, successfully emulates the New Orleans
accent he practiced since his role in Robert Altman's "The
Gingerbread Man," essentially stealing the show while Elmer
Bernstein's soundtrack pumps away furiously throughout to
compensate for the middling dialogue.

Author
Homer Yen
If you haven't plunked down your hard-earned money yet for "Wild Wild
West," the latest summer holiday offering from Will Smith, let me say
right now that your money will be better spent on a Starbuck's
Frappacino or on a Ben & Jerry's Sundae.  These treats are great relief
from the summer heat.  In contrast, this film made me simmer in
disappointment.
I can accept the fact that summer movies tend to put more weight into
special effects and that good stories and flavorful characters usually
take a back seat.  This was true of Star Wars Episode I, but at least
in that film, the story and the characters were still in the back seat.
 In this film, they are no where to be found.  What remains are
hundreds of male extras costumed as gunslingers and foppish
aristocrats, lots of female extras who look like Can-Can dancers, and a
clunky, 80-foot tall instrument of destruction that resembles a
mechanical tarantula.
Two men are asked to stop this threat.  One is Artemus Gordon (Kevin
Kline), an inventor who uses his intellect and array of disguises to
best his opponents.  Among his creations are false breasts and the
bulletproof vest.  The other man is Jim West (Will Smith), who prefers
the shoot-first-then-shoot-some-more method of investigating.  Although
their individual talents must be combined to achieve success, their
interaction with one another merely seemed like a second rate, two-man
Vaudevillian act.  For example, there is a scene where West, being more
debonair than the reserved Gordon, notes that the fake breasts should
be filled with water rather than buckwheat, which is what it is
currently filled with.  "Now touch my breast," West says.  Gordon does
so and then softly coos his approval.  I found myself groaning at this
kind of silliness.  The script fails to generate any sense of drama,
humor, or fun for that matter.
I did enjoy Kline's reserved performance, but was surprised at how much
latitude they gave to Smith.  Could it be that Will Smith is just so
bankable that he's not even required to act?  It was as if the director
was yelling "Will Smith, do your own thing...AND ACTION!"  Here's an
example.  In this scene, Will Smith is about to be hanged by a group of
angry white people.  He must endear himself to the crowd to escape. 
The director yells, "Will Smith, do your own thing...AND ACTION!"  In
another scene, he has to masquerade as a belly dancer in order to save
his comrades.  "Will Smith, do your own thing...AND ACTION!"
Worse still, the final battle scene aboard the mechanical tarantula is
a horrid mess.  There are cogs spinning and pulleys pulling and levers
going up and down everywhere you look.  There's actually a lot of
imagination at work in this film.  There are some genuinely clever
inventions and gizmos introduced, but all of this imagination is wasted
in a film that is visually cluttered and dramatically flat.  And that's
too bad because if there was more focus on the story rather than Will
Smith just doing his 'thing,' this film might have been palatable.  As
it turns out, "Wild Wild West" is the wild, wild worst and receives my
vote for biggest disappointment of the year.  


Author
David Wilcock
Starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline and Kenneth Branagh
Directed by Barry Sonnenfeld
Running Time: 1 hour 47 minutes
Summer movies are, by nature, dumb affairs that are usually made for some
quick enjoyment and to make money. Wild Wild West, the latest Will Smith
affair, follows much the same formula, except that it is dumber and less
enjoying than most summer movies. Will Smith plays Jim West, a black sheriff
with a nice line in sunglasses. He is called by President Grant (Kline) to
go on a mission to find out why top government scientists are disappearing.
West is paired up with scientist Artemus Gordon (Kline again) and the two
track the missing scientists to a legless mastermind, named Dr.Loveless
(Branagh, with a zany moustache.)
Before I pile on with the many negatives in this sorry affair, I'll give it
a chance with the positives. There's a nice credit sequence, the production
design by Bo Welch is pleasing to the eye, and the special effects are
decent enough. There's also a pleasant soundtrack. Buried deep in the dross
are one or two amusing jokes. And Salma Hayek pops up as the female
interest, which is always nice to see. Apart from these factors, though,
nothing else in Wild Wild West works.
Firstly, there's little chemistry between Smith and Kline, who appears to be
in it purely for the money. One would expect zingers passing between the
two: none arise. Both of them plod through the below standard plot, knowing
that there is a pay cheque waiting at the end. Not even Kenneth Branagh
provides much entertainment: although he is over the top, the material
doesn't present much opportunity for Branagh to be truly crazy. Therefore,
he just comes across as loud as obnoxious. The only enjoyable performance
comes from the sexy Salma Hayek, who is given so little screen time it's
embarrassing. She appears to be in the film to merely show off her body, and
be ogled at by Kline and Smith. Her character also changes at a whim to fit
the mechanics of the script, and there is no sense of realism about the
character.
The 'humour' in the film is also very off. Will Smith put a little spin to
his daft lines in Men In Black, here, not even Smith could save the humour
on display. The script largely boils down to insults that aren't very funny,
and one-liners that barely raise a smirk. It's also somewhat racist,
although it doesn't intend to be, with one scene with Jim West trying to
wisecrack his way out of a lynching, and actually says slavery is good to
save himself. It's not a funny scene, and the whole thing comes off rather
uncomfortably. The film also makes the tragic mistake that a man (in this
case Kline) in a dress is automatically unfunny, it isn't, but the Wild Wild
West makes this joke even more painful to watch through pure ineptness.
There's also problems with the plot. Jim West and Artemus Gordon get caught
up in all kinds of sticky situations, but the way they get out of them are
always unsatisfying, and rely purely on luck, rather than audience pleasing
skill. Plot elements are introduced into the film, and then thrown away just
as quickly. The main piece of the story, a 80 foot mechanical, steam driven
spider devised by Loveless looks rather impressive, but there's no
particular reason why it should be built. Why not Loveless build a great big
tank, instead of an ungainly, fragile piece of machinery that's just begging
to be blown up?
Director Barry Sonnenfeld always has a breezy look to them, with some nice
camera tricks, but even this is missing from this stilted affair. Wild Wild
West could have benefited from Sonnenfelds whacked out style of directing,
but not much of it is evident, making this film drag out even more. It's a
sad thing when _four_ (credited) screenwriters, a talented director and a
willing star can't make a film work, and eventually Wild Wild West collapses
under it's sexist, mildly racist, unfunny weight.

Author
Mr. Bryan Frankenseuss Theiss
   A lot of people had it in for Wild Wild West the minute they saw the first
trailer. They didn't like the western meets Jules Verne gimmickry. They assumed
the horrible Will Smith-ization of the Stevie Wonder classic "I Wish" was
representative of the film's score. And many white people had the ludicrous
complaint that a black man can't play a government agent in the 1860s, even in
a comedy-fantasy where his mission is to stop a legless supervillain in an
80-foot mechanical tarantula from assassinating President Grant.
  I had high hopes, though. There are two types of people in this world: those
who think giant steam powered robotic spiders are stupid, and those who don't.
I am most certainly in the latter category, and proud of it. I have never quite
accepted Will Smith as an actor, despite his pretty good performance in Six
Degrees of Separation. His poor comic timing and self-conscious "I'm being
funny right now" delivery has always bothered me in his comedies and action
films. With the Wild Wild West trailer, I thought I might be seeing a new, more
refined Will Smith, whose delivery matches his charisma.
  But I was wrong. Will Smith continues his tradition of ruining any good lines
he has. When he finds something that is funny (like his lines about a "white
woman's boobies") he can't help but repeat it several times until you want to
tell him, "Okay, I thought it was funny for a second there, but it's done now.
Knock it off." And then he keeps going until you want to say, "What did I tell
you? It's not funny anymore. God damn it, would you stop it?" Some lines are
mildly amusing, but you still can't help but wish they were delivered by
someone else. At one point, he confronts some evil henchmen aboard the robotic
tarantula, and claims that he's there to deliver a telegram to the sinister Dr.
Loveless from his mama. It's obviously meant to have a young Eddie Murphy con
man type of feel to it, but Smith doesn't have the acting chops to sell a line
like this. If it were Chris Tucker, you'd believe that West really wants these
henchmen to believe his pathetic lie. With Smith you just think, "Oh, that
would have been a pretty funny line in a better movie."
  Smith's collaborator, director Barry Sonnenfeld, has not only not improved,
but has gone downhill. One thing about Sonnenfeld is that he's never been as
funny in his movies as he seems to be in real life. A Sonnenfeld interview is
always a hilarious and entertaining freak show spectacular. Sonnenfeld either
is, or wants us to believe that he is, a ridiculously neurotic lunatic
terrorized by his status as a successful Hollywood director. On set, he is said
to dress in the same style as his film's protagonists, defer creative decisions
to his wife "Sweetie," and frequently start bawling when a scene doesn't work.
On the set of Wild Wild West he allegedly collapsed in the grass and tearfully
told Smith that his wife was dying of brain cancer. Later he realized that he
was just feeling depressed because he was hungry. On Men In Black, he wore a
tie that was too long and accidentally wiped his ass with it.
   Another thing about Sonnenfeld is that his movies tend to seem funnier at
the time. Upon release, The Addams Family seemed like a delightfully faithful
in-the-flesh re-creation of Charles Addams' morbid cartoons. Now the novelty
has worn off, it doesn't have enough jokes and it comes off rather dull. At the
time, Addams Family Values seemed like a much funnier, more satirical take on
the characters. Now it seems too broad and obvious. Sonnenfeld is not as
imaginative or skillful as other cartoonish directors like Tim Burton, and he's
not nearly as clever as his former collaborators the Coen Brothers (for whom he
was a director of photography). But he's delivered some enjoyable trifles, Get
Shorty was a good film, and he produced the definitive Elmore Leonard movie Out
of Sight. I've always thought of him as one of the good guys. Not a genius, but
with his heart in the right place.
  With Wild Wild West, Sonnenfeld seems to be closer to the fake-eccentric
commercial hack that some have made him out to be than the above-average
goofball entertainer I like to think of him as. The former camera virtuoso has
grown  Michael-Bay-incoherent in his cinematic storytelling. I came out with a
long list of story points I hadn't followed: How did the metal plate guy get
electrocuted? Who was the dead guy hanging from the chain? How did they figure
out that Artemus was not the real president? When did they save the scientist,
Mr. Escobar? What did they plan to do with the flying machine before M. Emmett
Walsh offered them explosives?
  These things and others are unclear, while other story points are
embarrassingly over-explained. We don't really need Artemus to point out that
he got his attack strategy when he saw a bee kill a tarantula in the desert -
we figured out the significance of that as soon as we saw it. When Jim West
gets shot point blank and falls to the ground, we don't need to have a long
stare at him laying as if dead, then slowly waking up, then slowly opening his
jacket, then slowly discovering that the bullet has been stopped by Artemus'
chain mail vest. Again, we knew this was going to happen as soon as we first
spotted the invention.
  Men In Black had a lot of enjoyable alien gimmickry - aliens inside dogs,
aliens inside people's heads, tentacled alien babies whacking Will Smith real
hard against the top of a car. In the end, it felt like too many of these
gimmicks had been given away in the trailers, and if there had only been a
little bit more, it would have worked a lot better. But Wild Wild West makes
you yearn for the not-quite-full feel of Men In Black. There are a few great
gimmicks - the tarantula, assassins hiding inside paintings, a projector hooked
up to a severed head to reveal the last image it saw. But that's about it. 
  Men In Black was also hurt by Smith's poorly delivered punchlines, which
never quite worked for me. But the film was anchored by Tommy Lee Jones, who
played the material straight like it obviously needed to be played. Here, no
one plays it straight enough. Kevin Kline is introduced to us in a long,
painfully unfunny scene in which he dresses as a woman and attracts many sleazy
men by speaking in a Miss Piggy voice. Astonishingly, the filmmakers chose to
repeat this routine in another, even more embarrassing scene with Smith wearing
the fake tits.
  Kenneth Branagh doesn't help anything with his over-the-top, hammy
performance as the villain, Dr. Arliss Loveless. The best way to describe the
character is to explain that at one point he yells, "Let the party begin!" You
know the type, like Tommy Lee Jones or Jim Carrey in Batman Forever. The kind
of villain who talks really loud, delighting in his own accent, but never
inspiring fear or amusement. The type of villain you never want to invite to
your multiplex again.
    Salma Hayek is utterly wasted as Rita, a woman who comes along for the ride
in order to come along for the ride? This is an actress who has become a near
legend just by dancing with a snake in one scene of a mildly-popular vampire
flick. And somehow, they've made her the least memorable female lead in recent
Hollywood history. I saw the movie yesterday and I can't even remember anything
she did in it. In fact, the only characters I really liked much were Dr.
Loveless' henchwomen, who are played by supermodels and have names like Munitia
and Lipreada. They're the only characters who seem to be simplistic on purpose.
 The media and newsgroup writers have been making a big deal about Wild Wild
West's disappointing box office numbers. I hope the suits don't blame it on the
subject matter, but instead see that even big summer movies need to be handled
with some precision and some wit. For a while it seemed like audiences would
bend over for any well marketed piece of shit, with the standards getting lower
all the time. Witness the astounding success of Batman Forever, Independence
Day and Armageddon. I know things will never turn the way I want them to, where
disposable, pre-fabricated blockbusters are given the cold shoulder and more
imaginative movies like, say, Babe: Pig in the City and Rushmore are seen and
enjoyed by millions. Still, when mainstream audiences share my disgust with a
Godzilla or a Wild Wild West, it makes the world feel a little happier, a
little more unified.
"I write rhymes so fresh I try to bite my own verses." --Tash

Author
Curtis Edmonds
by Curtis Edmonds -- blueduck@hsbr.org
Before I say anything negative about Wild Wild West, I want to take a
moment and remind you that Kevin Kline can act.
Remember the scene in A Fish Called Wanda where Wanda (Jamie Lee Curtis)
and Otto (Kline) are preparing to double-cross their partners and nab the
look from the safe where it's hidden?  Otto cracks the safe open and...
surprise... it's empty.  Kline stands up, empties his pistol into the safe,
and screams: "I'M DISAPPOINTED!!!"
Well, Wild Wild West has Kevin Kline.  And Mr. Summer Movie himself, Will
Smith.  And Kenneth Branagh, the greatest Shakespearian actor of our time.
And the babelicious Salma Hayek. And Ted Levine from The Silence of the
Lambs.  And It's directed by Barry Sonnenfeld, who directed Get Shorty, and
was the cinematographer for Miller's Crossing, one of the best movies ever.
Wild Wild West is as bad as a movie can be without actually having Richard
Gere in it.  It's an action movie with no action to speak of, a comedy
movie with no laughs, a buddy cop movie with no chemistry between the
leads.  The only person who comes out of this debacle with anything close
to honor or dignity is George Clooney's agent, who saved his client from an
embarrassing debacle.  A Newsweek critic called Wild Wild West this year's
Hudson Hawk, which is an insult to Hudson Hawk.  (Hudson Hawk at least had
Sandra Bernhard screeching maniacally and Danny Aiello and Bruce Willis
singing show tunes -- there's nothing even that diverting in Wild Wild
West.)
This is the part of the review where you're supposed to recapitulate the
plot, but I can't.  It's too painful.  Instead, what follows are a few
brief observations:
1.  Never, ever, EVER again make another movie from a Sixties TV series.
The Avengers should have served as a warning to everyone in Hollywood:
don't ever do this again.  Please, please, please, stay away from Hogan's
Heroes and The Prisoner and, er, I don't know, Gomer Pyle.  Placing the
successes of movies like The Fugitive and Wayne's World aside, maybe a
Congressional ban on recycling TV shows might be worth looking into.
(Consider that Twin Peaks, the best show of the 1980's, was made into an
indescribably wretched movie.)
2.  Wild Wild West has a lot of special effects, but it comes at a time
when we're becoming more blase about special effects.  Remember how neat it
was in Forrest Gump when the filmmakers used computer graphics to make Gary
Sinise look as if he had no legs?  Branagh's character also has no legs,
and they use the same tricks, but it's not nearly as cool now.
3.  In a summer chock-full of tasteless movies, the offensive attempts at
humor in Wild Wild West really stand out.  Charles Krauthammer did an
excellent piece in the Washington Post about how the portrayal of Branagh's
character (who uses a steam-powered wheelchair) is insensitive to people
with disabilities.  The racial jokes aimed at the Will Smith character are
just as bad.  I don't have any problem with casting Will Smith in the Jim
West role -- he does a pretty good job, given what he had to work with --
but the smart move would have been to ignore his race in the screenplay.
Instead, we get things like lynching jokes that are so far from being funny
that you'd have to stand in line for a passport to get there.
5.  Salma Hayek is given nothing to do in this movie but stand around and
look pretty.  This might have been OK if she had gotten a fair amount of
screen time, but she doesn't even get that.
6.  Kevin Kline imitates the President at one point in the movie, which he
did in Dave.  (Dave is a lot better movie.)  I think Robert Conrad was
rumored to want the President Grant part, but a kind fate intervened and
saved him from embarrassment.
7.  The black-white buddy-cop thing has officially been done to death now.
So has the bit about the villain falling to his death from a high place.
Wild Wild West doesn't have a car chase, thankfully, but it has a train
chase that's not all that interesting.  (One could wish that the filmmakers
had seen Narrow Margin for hints on how to do a train chase, or even the
Under Siege sequel... and yes, it says something about the quality of Wild
WIld West when I can compare it unfavorably to a Steven Seagal movie.)
8.  Another note about the casting:  One can't help but wonder if the movie
could have been better if Kevin Kline were the villain and Kenneth Branagh
were the Artemus Gordon character.  Kline makes no impression whatsoever as
Artemus Gordon:  he's shallow, fussy, vain and condescending.  And Branagh
just mucks the supervillain thing up awfully, really, it's pathetic for an
actor of his skills.  Kline would be a much better choice for the villain:
he'd bring a certain class to the role that's completely missing from
Branagh's performance.  And Branagh could do the Artemus Gordon part in his
sleep.
9.  Even if the casting switch wouldn't have worked, it certainly couldn't
have made things worse.  There's no way of making things worse in the Wild
WIld West short of bringing in a giant army of Ewoks to trip over the giant
metal tarantula or something godawful like that.
I could go on, of course, but slinging invective makes my arm tired.  Don't
go see the Wild Wild West, but if you do, don't be surprised if you hear
people walking out of the theater yelling, "I'M DISAPPOINTED!!!"  Don't be
surprised if you're one of them, either.

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
As a boy I looked forward to "The Willd, Wild West" on Friday evenings;  
after a busy week of grade school, it was a cool way to begin the weekend.  
Even cooler were the gadgets produced by Artemus Gordon (Ross Martin) and 
the swagger of Jim West (Robert Conrad).
"Wild,Wild West" is the latest movie revival of a classic TV show.  So for 
fans of the campy series of 1975-70, the origin alone makes it a must-see.  
As a film divorced from its thirty-something ancestor, it is just better 
than average.  In this incarnation, Will Smith plays James West, and Kevin 
Kline is Artie Gordon.
One thing the movie does well is preserve the edgy friendship between West 
and Gordon.  Just as Bob Conrad was younger than Ross Martin, Will Smith is 
several years' Kevin Kline's junior.  In one scene they play the comic 
counterparts of The Defiant Ones, linked together by Dr. Loveless' deadly 
magnets instead of by chains.  The scene is hilarious, containing the wit, 
timing and physical comedy of two experienced actors.  Even at the end, when 
the new Secret Service agents are friends, there is the bite of competition 
between them
Premise:  The world isn't safe because of the devilish Dr. Arliss Loveless 
(Kenneth Branaugh).  Cut in half in the Civil War, Loveless has resurfaced 
in 1869 with a plot to use his evil technology to take control of the United 
States, and divide it up between himself and the empires that formerly 
occupied North America - England, France, and Spain.  An associate of 
Loveless', a former Confederate general called "Bloodbath" McGrath, the 
Butcher of Libertyville, leads the heroes to Loveless.  President Grant, who 
commissioned West and Gordon to track down the arch-villain, is himself put 
in grave danger when Loveless puts to use a terrible engine of war.  The 
machine is a Gargantuan metal spider, its legs supporting a body occupied by 
sophisticated furnaces and pulleys and a cockpit captained by Loveless and 
his vampy sidekicks.
All these elements combine to make "Wild, Wild West" into an action 
period-piece with very watchable special effects.  Besides the tank-spider, 
Loveless uses an amphibious ironclad, a way-advanced wheel chair (which 
highlights the effects that take away Branaugh's legs), and a murderous 
propelled saw blade that tracks down its victims, who wear a magnetic 
collar.  Of course Artie Gordon has his own arsenal of martial gimmicks.  
All of them are introduced early in the narrative, James Bond-style, and 
utilized later.  The tamest perhaps is a pistol smaller than a Derringer;  
the weirdest is a human head used as a projector, with Artie discovering the 
last image (burned into the retinas) seen by the victim.  In all, the film 
blends special effects quite well with the action that surrounds them.
As James West, Will Smith has been discussed as an unusual choice.  (George 
Clooney was first offered the role, with Smith as Artemus Gordon.)  Because 
of his versatility, though, Smith pulls it off.  He is fast-talking and 
-punching, and what adds an interesting dimension to his situation is the 
script's use of racial humor.  I have not yet decided if the film makes too 
much mention of Smith's race, but I admire Smith and director Barry 
Sonnenfeld, as well as the screenwriting team, for attempting this risk.  A 
couple of times, the African-American James West uses Stepin Fetchit 
stereotypes, before resorting to his considerable skills, to escape tricky 
situations.  One scene, when a mob tries to lynch West for tapping a woman's 
breasts, falls far short of Cleavon Little in "Blazing Saddles."  It's 
engaging, though, when West and Loveless exchange hateful puns, West 
attacked for being black, and Loveless for being "half a man."
Kevin Kline delivers another seamless performance, getting into the part of 
Artie Gordon with good humor.  A master of disguise, inventor of ingenious 
weaponry, factotum of the highest order, Gordon is very likable, and Kline's 
comic sense puts Gordon just the right amount over-the-top.  At various 
times this sharp U. S. marshal masquerades as a buxom woman and President 
Grant.  (After 'Dave', it's the second flick that's given Kline a chance to 
play a president and his double!)
Salma Hayek plays Rita Escobar, who appears first as a caged playmate of 
Loveless'.  After Gordon liberates her, Rita reveals she is the daughter of 
one the scientists kidnapped by Loveless to design and build the monster 
spider.  She accompanies the two agents throughout most of their hi-jinx.  
Though Hayek is a solid actress and easy to look at, she is used mainly for 
decoration here, her function to cause conflict between potential boyfriends 
West and Gordon.
In smaller roles, Ted Levine plays a grimy, disgusting, head-injured General 
McGrath.  M. Emmet Walsh plays a cagey train engineer who transports the 
agents about on "The Wanderer,"a train loaded with one-of-a-kind gimmickry.  
Walsh has been around films and television a long time, and has a memorable 
character actor face;  his performance is strong here, especially in his 
reactions to double-entendres exchanged by West and Gordon.
By now Barry Sonnenfeld has a famous relationship with Will Smith;  he's 
even called Smith a 'co-director.'  Sonnenfeld controls the pace well, 
except many scenes follow each other too quickly, editor Jim Miller relying 
too much on two-second establishing shots.
Set decoration is marvelous, with each interior showing a Victorian rococo 
style.  Loveless' wheelchair, for instance, sports the metal scrollwork seen 
atop the fancy smokestacks of riverboats.  Walls of saloons and the White 
House are equally intricate.  The exteriors rely on the breath-taking vistas 
of the West - one half of the meaning of the title, after all.
A shortcoming is that the plot is a bit too straight-forward.  It seems to 
lack the complications, both in sublplots and in character development, 
needed for depth.  Jim West's personal stake in doing away with McGrath and 
Loveless is a bit hard to swallow as well.  What amounts to a one-act chase 
scene is what the viewer sees, though it makes for a pleasurable watching.  
There's a good deal of the charming camp I spied first in the television 
series, but there's also the late nineties language and innuendo that makes 
this a strict PG-13.  Watch it with a teenager today.


Author
Jon Popick

President Grant assigns two U.S. Marshals (Will Smith and Kevin Kline)
to stop a deranged madman (Kenneth Branagh) from wreaking havoc on the
country with a giant mechanical spider.
That's the basic premise of Wild Wild West.  Now let's break it down:
Take out `Will Smith' and `Kevin Kline' because everyone knows that
they're the stars of this film.  Take out `two U.S. Marshals to' because
it's common knowledge that Smith and Kline are reprising roles
popularized by the 60s television show of the same name.  Take out `a
giant mechanical spider' because it's already been rammed down the
throat of you, the moviegoer, for several months (via the trailer).
Take out `Kenneth Branagh' and `deranged madman' because the two are
mutually exclusive and, therefore, should cancel each other out.  Take
out `from wreaking havoc on the country' because you should expect
nothing less from a deranged madman.  Take out `President Grant assigns'
becausewell, just because I've written myself into a hole.
What do we have left from our original sentence?
Stop paying to see movies like this.  Then studios will stop making
movies like this and stop ripping off old movies and TV shows.  Please
make them stop.
West opens in 1869 Louisiana, where we encounter a terrified man with a
giant metal collar around his neck.  He's running from a deadly spinning
disc that seems intent on removing his head from his torso.  It does.
Then the film launches into its finest moment  the slick retro opening
credits, which are a hopped-up version of the TV version.  But it's all
downhill from there.
Smith (Enemy of the State) plays James T. West, the character previously
handled on television by Robert Conrad.  That's right; Will Smith.
Playing a U.S. Marshal in 1869.  In the South.  Anybody have a problem
with this?  I guess the filmmakers decided it was okay to cast West
black so they could add the racism jokes and the hysterical lynching
scene.  Bruce Willis just wouldn't have cut it in the noose.  Besides,
everybody likes watching Smith on the big screen so that we can forget
just how annoying his yapping real-life wife is.
Kevin Kline (William Shakespeare's A Midsummer Night's Dream) is Artemus
Gordon, a Marshal slightly more refined than the trigger-happy West.
Gordon is content to work without a sidearm and almost seems too eager
to don dress and makeup to catch his man.  He also likes to invent
things - like the airplane he quickly whipped up to beat the enormous
spider.  In 1869.  Decades before Kitty Hawk.  It actually made The
A-Team look realistic.  Gordon is also a master of disguise and, at one
point, impersonates President Grant.  Dave anyone?
Kenneth Branagh (Celebrity) handles the role of Dr. Arliss Loveless 
previously a midget on the television show, but missing his legs on the
big screen  a victim of the Civil War (and, more specifically,
according to Lovelace, the premature surrender of the Confederacy).  He
also is short one lung, bladder, a kidney and approximately 32 feet of
intestines, but does have facial hair that made me think of the Insane
Clown Posse.  Loveless has kidnapped scientists specializing in physics
and hydraulics in order to build his death spider, which he unveils at
the opening of the Transcontinental Railroad in Utah.  Instead of a cool
sidekick, he has three comely underlings: Amazonia (supermodel
Frederique Van Der Wal), Munitia (Musetta Vander, Mortal Kombat:
Annihilation) and Lippenreider (Sofia Eng).  She reads lips.  Get it?
Point the finger of shame at the crack staff of writers, who previously
churned out earlier crap like Ghost Dad and Doc Hollywood.  Don't let
director Barry Sonnenfeld (Men in Black) off the hook either.  He's
0-for-2 since abandoning films that don't feature a character named
`Lerch.'
Other annoyances included Gordon's invention of a primitive type of
Kevlar, which stopped a bullet fired at point-blank range into West's
chest.  There were a slew of hit-and-miss double entendres, mostly
involving blacks and cripples.  Then there was the ending, where Grant
enlisted West and Gordon to create the Secret Service because they did
such a good job protecting him.  The Secret Service was actually created
a few years earlier for the sole purpose of preventing counterfeiting;
they didn't protect the President until about sixty years later.  And
don't forget the IQ-reducing theme song.  I made my own up
(1:47 - PG-13 for action violence, sex references and innuendo)

Author
David Sunga
Written by: Written by S.S. Wilson, Brent Maddock, Jeffrey Price and Peter
S. Seaman
Starring: Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Salma Hayek, and Kenneth Branagh
Synopsis: 
Will Smith plays James West and Kevin Kline is Artemus Gordon in this 1999
movie based on the 1965-70 television adventure/spy series about two 1860s
cowboy secret agents. 
West attends a party and soon finds himself in trouble. "Sorry I made the
mistake of drumming on a white woman's breasts," says West. Meanwhile
Gordon falls for a saloon girl named Rita (Salma Hayek) whose father has
been kidnapped. "She's a breath of fresh ass, I mean a breast of fresh
air," the love-smitten Gordon remarks. The kidnapper, a scientist named Dr.
Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), is wheelchair-bound, a condition which
gives West ample comedic ammunition for emasculation and shortness jokes.
As West, Gordon and Rita give chase Loveless plots to dismantle America and
give most of it to European colonialist rulers. 
Opinion:
These days I often hear the WILD WILD WEST song played on MTV. It sounds
like an old Stevie Wonder tune with all the same chords but they changed
the words and now it's WILD WILD WEST. The song makes a pretty catchy
advertisement for the movie. 
WILD WILD WEST (1999) shows how agents West and Gordon first meet and
become partners. Usually in cop buddy movies new partners develop a close
bond after some initial friction. Unfortunately, in WILD WILD WEST
chemistry between West and Gordon never seems to develop. James West has
initial misgivings about technology and develops a bond with it, but he
doesn't seem to like Gordon any more or any less by the end of the movie.
West is a Civil War Era African American and Gordon is a white stranger,
but the whole relationship aspect seems unexplored.
On the other hand, it's supposed to be escapist fantasy. WILD WILD WEST is
the kind of movie where they spend a fortune on special effects but blunder
on the details. A bad guy gets electrocuted with a big wrench. I didn't see
any batteries or wires. West plucks a flattened bullet from the INSIDE of
his bulletproof vest rather than the OUTSIDE. Huh? Loveless captures Rita
and threatens to use her for his pleasure, but Loveless has already had the
lower half of his body chopped off. And so on.
Given a choice between hearing the MTV song or watching the movie, I take
the song. 
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
Christian Pyle
Another July Fourth weekend, another big Will Smith action/sci fi release. 
This time around, Smith stars in the big screen version of the "Wild Wild West"
TV series (1965-1970), a light-hearted, campy western with lots of science
fiction elements.  Although I'm generally opposed to the trend of making every
1960's TV series into a movie, I enjoyed "Wild Wild West."
It's 1869, a few years after the Civil War.  Government agent Jim West (Smith)
is tracking former Confederate general "Bloodbath" McGrath (Ted Levine, best
known as Buffalo Bill in "Silence of the Lambs"), who was responsible for
slaughtering a community of freed slaves which included Jim's parents.  Jim
collides with marshal and inventor Artemus Gordon (Kevin Kline), who is
following McGrath to find a group of kidnapped scientists.  President Grant
(also Kline) assigns Jim and Artie to work on the case together. 
They trail McGrath to Louisiana and find that the mastermind behind the
abduction of the scientists is Dr. Arliss Loveless (Kenneth Branagh), a mad
scientist who lost half of his body creating super-weapons for the Confederacy.
 Loveless plans to conquer the country and carve it up between himself and
various other nations.  With the help of a giant mechanical spider, Loveless
kidnaps the president just before Grant can drive the golden spike joining the
transcontinental railroad.
The appeal of "Wild Wild West" depends almost entirely on the charisma of Will
Smith.  There's a scene in the movie where he charms a mob that is ready to
lynch him, and that scene typifies Smith:  he is irresistibly funny and
likeable.  Since he's playing an action hero, Smith swaggers a lot, talks
tough, and acts cool, but it's his sense of humor and genial nature that make
the movie fun.
Also delightful is Branagh's performance.  Perhaps taking his cue from Jack
Nicholson's Joker, Branagh revels in playing a campy, over-the-top cartoon
villain.  His Southern accent is deliberately exaggerated (he can do a more
realistic one; check out "The Gingerbread Man"), and he grins broadly most of
the time.
The weak link is Kline.  He seems ill-pale, sagging, tired.  The buddy film
elements fall flat because Kline seems unable to hold up his end.  His usual
comic energy (on display as recently as "In & Out") is entirely absent.  He's a
bit funnier as Grant than as Artie.
For some reason, Salma Hayek is in this movie.  Her character, Rita Escobar, is
also on the trail of the scientists, but there are only token nods toward a
romance between Rita and either hero.  Rita wanders in and out of the movie,
and the audience is not motivated to notice either her presence or her absence.
The script, from writers responsible for "Tremors" and "Who Framed Roger
Rabbit?," has both strengths and weaknesses.  The overall plot (kidnapped
scientists, mad scientist plotting conquest, heroes with opposing personalities
thrown together) is tired and predictable.  However, there are small touches
that are clever.  I especially enjoyed how the gadgets Artie invents seem to
work with nineteenth-century technology.  For example, a miniature drill he
carries is powered by an air pump in his boot heel.  There is also a hint of
intelligence in the theme of national unity:  Loveless threatens to tear apart
the country which has only recently be rejoined and chooses to strike just
before the spike can be driven into the railroad that will physically unite
west and east.
Elmer Bernstein's score deserves special mention.  Smith's rap theme, which was
featured in the trailers, is saved for the end credits.  "Wild Wild" begins
with an updated version of the TV theme, and Bernstein (who's scored over 150
movies but is best known for "The Magnificent Seven") gives us rousing, heroic
music that draws on the long tradition of western movies.
Best known for "The Addams Family" and "Men in Black," director Barry
Sonnenfeld has a style that is free-flowing, bizarre, and fun.  Although his
work as a director lacks the depth of his work as a cinematographer under other
directors (most notably the Coen Brothers; Sonnenfeld photographed "Blood
Simple," "Raising Arizona," and "Miller's Crossing"), he can be relied upon to
deliver a movie that is visually interesting and unusual.
Read my reviews and others at the Mad Review: 
http://www.wpd.net/madreview/

Author
Eugene Novikov
"Not every situation requires your patented approach of shoot first,
shoot later, shoot some more and then when everybody's dead try to ask a
question or two."
Starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline, Salma Hayek, Kenneth Branagh. Rated
PG-13.
Will Smith owns the July 4th weekend. The last two summers, a box-office
smash has been released on the July 4th weekend and each of them has
starred Will Smith. Those blockbusters were, of course, Independence Day
and Men In Black. After both of them more than tripled their respective
budgets ($75 million for ID4 and $90 million for MIB), Warner Bros.
decided to raise the stakes this year with Wild Wild West. The studio
poured $175 million dollars into the project, making it the second most
expensive film of all time.
This exuberant action-comedy romp is the second in a couple of dubious
remakes that have been thrown our way this year (the first, a special-
effects extravaganza called The Mummy was supposedly a remake of a 1932
movie starring Boris Karloff, but the two have nothing in common beyond
the fact that they are about mummies). It is a remake of an old tv show
of the same name, but a lot has changed. Jim West (played by Will Smith
as opposed to Robert Conrad) is a secret service agent working for
President Ulysses S. Grant. He is paired with Artemis Gordon (Kevin
Kline, funny by just showing up), a US Marshal, master of disguise and
maker of wacky crime-fighting gizmos that would make Inspector Gadget
proud. Together they must stop Dr. Loveless (Kenneth Branagh, a
delight), a legless Confederate war general with a hairbrained scheme to
take over the US government.
Wild Wild West also stars Salma Hayek as Rita Escobar, a role that
exists for the sole purpose of attracting horny teenagers. Hayek (From
Dusk Till Dawn, Fools Rush In) must have been desperate for work to
accept this thankless role. Kline and Branagh, on the other hand have
plenty to flaunt in this movie. As the villain, Branagh takes a break
from Shakespeare and employs a weird accent to play Dr. Loveless with
occasionally hilarious gusto, and he seems to be having the time of his
life. Kline, in a dual role (he also puts on a fake beard and mustache
to play the President), brings to Artemis Gordon an entertaining
attitude, sparing what might have been an irritating character.
Unfortunately Will Smith, the star of the show, is just plain annoying,
cocky and unlikeable.
Director Barry Sonnenfeld (Addams Family Values, Men in Black) never
lets his movie fully become a parody, although it often heads in that
direction. As such, however, Wild Wild West is wretchedly inconsistent;
often amusing but also frequently tedious. For every gag that entertains
there are two that choke. For every scene with at least a trace of
excitement, two more are yawn-worthy. Admittedly, parts of Wild, Wild
West are fun (mostly those with Branagh), but overwhelmingly the film
fails to reach the level of suspense and humor necessary for it to
really work as an action-comedy.
By the time the much-lauded giant mechanical tarantula shows up it is
clear that this film is out of its element. If there is such a thing as
overbudgeting, this is it, folks. There is no room for eye-popping
special effects here. Wild, Wild West wants to thrive on camp (as well
as what is often referred to as "cheesiness"), but it's hard to be campy
with a 175 million dollar budget. A director would have to make sure the
film is discreet, and discreet Wild, Wild West is not.
Will Smith is a terrific actor, but here we never warm up to him or his
character. His Jim West is a creep, not the admirable role-model that a
hero of this movie should have been. It's a real problem when the
protagonist is a jerk because the burden falls on the supporting
characters who then have to do a spectacular job to make up for the
protagonist's lack of potency. Branagh and Kline are capable of doing
just that, and would have succeeded brilliantly were this a better
movie. But there isn't enough spark in the proceedings for the two
veterans to really blow are minds, although their performances are as
terrific as the movie permits them to be.
Wild Wild West will still be a huge draw and will do Warner Bros. proud.
But frankly, it's a letdown; not necessarily because it isn't
consistently funny or consistently exciting (I wasn't expecting a
masterpiece) but because I wasn't prepared to see such inanity from Will
Smith.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.
